The Project Gutenberg EBook of Memoirs Of Fanny Hill, by John Cleland

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org


Title: Memoirs Of Fanny Hill
       A New and Genuine Edition from the Original Text (London, 1749)

Author: John Cleland

Release Date: May 2, 2008 [EBook #25305]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK MEMOIRS OF FANNY HILL ***




Produced by David Widger





MEMOIRS OF FANNY HILL

By John Cleland

_A new and genuine edition from the original text (London, 1749)._

PARIS - ISIDORE LISEUX

Of this Edition, privately printed, there are 350 numbered copies, of
which this is number 111.




LETTER THE FIRST

I sit down to give you an undeniable proof of my considering your
desires as indispensable orders. Ungracious then as the task may be, I
shall recall to view those scandalous stages of my life, out of which I
emerged, at length, to the enjoyment of every blessing in the power of
love, health and fortune to bestow; whilst yet in the flower of youth,
and not too late to employ the leisure afforded me by great ease and
affluence, to cultivate an understanding, naturally not a despicable
one, and which had, even amidst the whirl of loose pleasures I had been
tossed in, exerted more observation on the characters and manners of
the world than what is common to those of my unhappy profession, who,
looking on all though or reflection as their capital enemy, keep it at
as great a distance as they can, or destroy it without mercy.

Hating, as I mortally do, all long unnecessary prefaces, I shall give
you good quarter in this, and use no farther apology, than to prepare
you for seeing the loose part of my life, written with the same liberty
that I led it.

Truth! stark, naked truth, is the word; and I will not so much as
take the pains to bestow the strip of a gauze wrapper on it, but paint
situations such as they actually rose to me in nature, careless of
violating those laws of decency that were never made for such unreserved
intimacies as ours; and you have too much sense, too much knowledge of
the originals, to sniff prudishly and out of character at the pictures
of them. The greatest men, those of the first and most leading taste,
will not scruple adorning their private closets with nudities, though,
in compliance with vulgar prejudices, they may not think them decent
decorations of the staircase, or salon.

This, and enough, premised, I go souse into my personal history.
My maiden name was Frances Hill. I was born at a small village near
Liverpool, in Lancashire, of parents extremely poor, and, I piously
believe, extremely honest.

My father, who had received a maim on his limbs, that disabled him
from following the more laborious branches of country drudgery, got,
by making nets, a scanty subsistence, which was not much enlarged by my
mother's keeping a little day-school for the girls in her neighborhood.
They had had several children; but none lived to any age except myself,
who had received from nature a constitution perfectly healthy.

My education, till past fourteen, was no better than very vulgar:
reading, or rather spelling, an illegible scrawl, and a little ordinary
plain work, composed the whole system of it; and then all my foundation
in virtue was no other than a total ignorance of vice, and the shy
timidity general to our sex, in the tender age of life, when objects
alarm or frighten more by their novelty than anything else. But then,
this is a fear too often cured at the expense of innocence, when Miss,
by degrees, begins no longer to look on a man as a creature of prey that
will eat her.

My poor mother had divided her time so entirely between her scholars
and her little domestic cares, that she had spared very little to my
instruction, having, from her own innocence from all ill, no hint or
thought of guarding me against any.

I was now entering on my fifteenth year, when the worst of ills befell
me in the loss of my fond, tender parents, who were both carried off by
the small-pox, within a few days of each other; my father dying first,
and thereby by hastening the death of my mother: so that I was now left
an unhappy friendless orphan (for my father's coming to settle there,
was accidental, he being originally a Kentisrman). That cruel distemper
which had proved so fatal to them, had indeed seized me, but with such
mild and favourable symptoms, that I was presently out of danger, and
what then I did not know the value of, was entirely unmarked I skip over
here an account of the natural grief and affliction which I felt on
this melancholy occasion. A little time, and the giddiness of that age,
dissipated too soon my reflections on that irreparable loss; but nothing
contributed more to reconcile me to it, than the notions that were
immediately put into my head, of going to London, and looking out for
a service, in which I was promised all assistance and advice from one
Esther Davis, a young woman that had beer down to see her friends, and
who, after the stay of a few days, was returned to her place.

As I had now nobody left alive in the village, who had concerned enough
about what should become of me, to start any objections to this scheme,
and the woman who took care of me after my parents' death, rather
encouraged me to pursue it, I soon came to a resolution of making this
launch into the wide world, by repairing to London, in order to seek my
fortune, a phrase which, by the bye, has ruined more adventurers of both
sexes, from the country, than ever it made or advanced.

Nor did Esther Davis a little comfort and inspirit me to venture with
her, by piquing my childish curiosity with the fine sights that were to
be seen in London: the Tombs, the Lions, the King, the Royal Family,
the fine Plays and Operas, and, in short, all the diversions which fell
within her sphere of life to come at; the detail of all which perfectly
turned the little head of me.

Nor can I remember, without laughing, the innocent admiration, not
without a spice of envy, with which we poor girls, whose church-going
clothes did not rise above dowlas shifts and stuff gowns, beplaced with
silver: all which we imagined grew in London, and entered for a great
deal into my determination of trying to come in for my share of them.

The idea however of having the company of a towns-woman with her, was
the trivial, and all the motives that engaged Esther to take charge of
me during my journey to town, where she told me, after the manner and
style, "as how several maids out of the country had made themselves and
all their kind for ever: that by preserving their virtue, some had
taken so with their masters, that they had married them, and kept them
coaches, and lived vastly grand and happy; and some, may-hap, came to be
Duchesses; luck was all, and why not I, as well as another?"; with other
almanacs to this purpose, which set me a tip-toe to begin this promising
journey, and to leave a place which, though my native one, contained no
relations that I had reason to regret, and was grown insupportable to
me, from the change of the tenderest usage into a cold air of charity,
with which I was entertained, even at the only friend's house that I had
the least expectation of care and protection from. She was, however, so
just to me, as to manage the turning into money the little matters that
remained to me after the debts and burial charges were allowed for, and,
at my departure, put my whole fortune into my hands; which consisted
of a very slender wardrobe, packed up in a very portable box, and eight
guineas, with seventeen shillings in silver, stowed in a spring-pouch,
which was a greater treasure than I ever had seen together, and which I
could not conceive there was a possibility of running out; and indeed, I
was so entirely taken up with the joy of seeing myself mistress of such
an immence sum, that I gave very little attention to a world of good
advice which was given me with it.

Places, then, being taken for Esther and me in the Chester waggon, I
pass over a very immaterial scene of leave-taking, at which I droped
a few tears betwixt grief and joy; and, for the same reasons of
insignificance, skip over all that happened to me on the road, such as
the waggoner's looking liquorish on me, the schemes laid for me by some
of the passengers, which were defeated by the valiance of my guardian
Esther; who, to do her justice, took a motherly care of me, at the
same time that she taxed me for the protection by making me bear all
travelling charges, which I defrayed with the unmost cheerfulness, and
thought myself much obliged to her into the bargain.

She took indeed great care that we were not overrated, or imposed on, as
well as of managing as frugally as possible; expensiveness was not her
vice.

It was pretty late in a summer evening when we reached the town, in our
slow conveyance, though drawn by six at length. As we passed through
the greatest streets that led to our inn, the noise, of the coaches, the
hurry, the crowds of foot passengers, in short, the new scenery of the
shops and houses, at once pleased and amazed me.

But guess at my mortification and surprise when we came to the inn, and
our things were landed and delivered to us, when my fellow traveller and
protectress, Esther Davis, who had used me with the utmost tenderness
during the journey, and prepared me by no preceedings signs for the
stunning blow I was to receive, when I say, my only dependence and
friend, in this strange place, all of a sudden assumed a strange and
cool air towards me, as if she dreaded my becoming a burden to her.

Instead, then, of proffering me the continuance of her assistance and
good offices, which I relied upon, and never more wanted, she thought
herself, it seems, abundantly acquitted of her engagements to me, by
having brought me safe to my journey's end, and seeing nothing in her
procedure towards me but what natural and in order, began to embrace me
by the way of taking leave, whilst I was so confounded, so struck,
that I had not spirit or sense enough so much as to mention my hopes
or expectations from her experience, and knowledge of the place she had
brought me to.

Whilst I stood thus stupid and mute, which she doubtless attributed to
nothing more than a concern at parting, this idea procured me perhaps a
slight alleviation of it, in the following harangue: "That now we were
got safe to London, and that she was obliged to go to her place, she
advised me by all means to get into one as soon as possible; that I need
not fear getting one; there were more places than parish-churches; that
she advised me to go to an intelligence office; that if she heard of
any thing stirring, she would find me out and let me know; that in the
meantime, I should take a private lodging, and acquaint her where to
send to me; that she wished me good luck, and hoped I should always
have the grace to keep myself honest, and not bringing a disgrace on
my parentage." With this; she took her leave of me, and left me, as it
were, on my own hands, full as lightly as I had been put into hers.

Left thus alone, absolutely destitute and friendless I began then to
feel most bitterly the severity of this separation, the scene of which
had passed in a little room in the inn; and no sooner was her back
turned, but the affliction I felt at my helpless strange circumstances,
burst out into a flood of tears, which infinitely relieved the oppression
of my heart; though I still remained stupified, and most perfectly
perplexed how to dispose of myself.

One of the waiters coming in, added yet more to my uncertainty, by
asking me, in a short way, if I called for anything? to which I replied
innocently: "No." But I wished him to tell me where I might get a
lodging for that night. He said he would go and speak to his mistress,
who accordingly came, and told me drily, without entering in the least
into the distress she saw me in, that I might have a bed for a shilling,
and that, as she supposed I had some friends in town (there I fetched a
deep sigh in vain!), I might provide for myself in the morning.

It is incredible what trifling consolations the human mind will seize
in its greatest afflictions. The assurance of nothing more than a bed to
lie on that night, calmed my agonies; and being ashamed to acquaint
the mistress of the inn that I had no friends to apply to in town, I
proposed to myself to proceed, the very next morning, to an intelligence
office, to which I was furnished with written directions on the back of
a ballad, Esther had given me. There I counted on getting information
of any place that such a country girl as I might be fit for, and where
I could get into any sort of being, before my little stock should be
consumed; and as to a character, Esther had often repeated to me, that I
might depend on her managing me one; nor, however affected I was at
her leaving me thus, did I entirely cease to rely on her, as I began to
think, good-naturedly, that her procedure was all in course, and that is
was only my ignorance of life that had made me take it in the light I at
first did.

Accordingly, the next morning I dressed myself as clean and as neat as
my rustic wardrobe would permit me; and having left my box, with special
recommendation, with the landlady, I ventured out by myself, and without
any more difficulty than can be supposed of a young country girl, barely
fifteen, and to whom every sign or shop was a gazing trap, I got to the
wished for intelligence office.

It was kept by an elderly woman, who sat at the receipt of custom, with
a book before her in great form and order, and several scrolls made out,
of directions for places.

I made up then to this important personage, without lifting up my eyes
or observing any of the people round me, who were attending there on the
same errand as myself, and dropping her curtsies nine deep, just made a
shift to stammer out my business to her.

Madam heard me out, with all the gravity and brow of a petty minister
of State, and seeing at one glance over my figure what I was, made me no
answer, but to ask me the preliminary shilling, on receipt of which she
told me places for women too slight built for hard work: but that she
would look over her book, and see what was to be done for me, desiring
me to stay a little, till she had dispatched some other customers.

On this I drew back a little, most heartily mortified at a declaration
which carried with it a killing uncertainly, that my circumstances could
not well endure.

Presently, assuming more courage, and seeking some diversion from my
uneasy thoughts, I ventured to lift up my head a little, and sent my
eyes on a course round the room, where they met full tilt with those
of a lady (for such my extreme innocence pronounced her) sitting in a
corner of the room, dressed in a velvet mantle (in the midst of summer),
with her bonnet off; squat, fat, red-faced, and at least fifty.

She looked as if she would devour me with her eyes, staring at me from
head to foot, without the least regard to the confusion and blushes her
eyeing me so fixedly put me to, and which were to her, no doubt, the
strongest recommendation and marks of my being fit for her purpose.
After a little time, in which my air, person and whole figure had
undergone a strict examination, which I had, on my part, tried to render
favourable to me, by primming, drawing up my neck, and setting my best
looks, she advanced and spoke to me with the greatest demureness:

"Sweet-heart, do you want a place?

"Yes, and please you," (with a curtsey down to the ground).

Upon this she acquainted me she was actually come to the office herself,
to look out for a servant; that she believed I might do, with a little
of her instruction; that she could take my very looks for a sufficient
character; that London was a very wicked, vile, place; that she hoped I
would be tractable, and keep out of bad company; in short, she said all
to me that an old experienced practitioner in town could think of,
and which was much more than was necessary to take in an artless
inexperienced country maid, who was even afraid of becoming a wanderer
about the streets, and therefore gladly jumped at the first offer of a
shelter, especially from so grave and matron-like a lady, for such
my flattering fancy assured me this new mistress of mine was, I being
actually hired under the nose of the good woman that kept the office,
whose shrewed smiles and shrugs I could not help observing, and
innocently interpreted them as marks of being pleased at my getting
into place so soon: but, as I afterwards came to know, these Beldams
understood one another very well, and this was a market where Mrs.
Brown, my mistress, frequently attended, on the watch for any fresh
goods that might offer there, for the use of her customers, and her own
profit.

Madam was, however, so well pleased with her bargain that fearing I
presume, lest better advice or some accident might occasion my slipping
through her fingers, she would officiously take me in a coach to my inn,
where, calling herself for my box, it was, I being present, delivered
without the least scruple or explanation as to where I was going.

This being over, she bid the coachman drive to a shop in St. Paul's
Churchyard, where she bought a pair of gloves, which she gave me, and
thence renewed her directions to the coachman to drive to her house in
------ street, who accordingly landed us at the door, after I had been
cheered up and entertained by the way with the most plausible flams,
without one syllable from which I could conclude anything but that I was,
by the greatest luck, fallen into the hands of kindest mistress, not to
say friend, that the vast world could afford; and accordingly I entered
her doors with most complete confidence and exultation, promising,
myself that, as soon as I could be a little settled, I would acquaint
Esther Davis with my rare good fortune.

You may be sure the good opinion of my place was not lessened by the
appearance of a very handsome back parlor, into which I was led and
which seemed to me magnificently furnished, who had never seen better
rooms than the ordinary ones in inns upon the road. There were two gilt
pier-glasses, and a buffet, on which a few pieces of plate, set out to
the most shew, dazzled, and altogether persuaded me that I must be got
into a very reputable family.

Here my mistress first began her part, with telling me that I must have
good spirits, and learn to be free with her; that she had not taken me
to be a common servant, to do domestic drudgery, but to be a kind of
companion to her; and that if I would be a good girl, she would do
more than twenty mothers for me; to all which I answered only by the
profoundest and the awkwardest curtsies, and a few monosyllables, such
as "'yes! no! to be sure!"

Presently my mistress touched the bell, and in came a strapping
maid-servant, who had let us in. "Here, Martha," said Mrs. Brown, "I
have just hired this young woman to look after my linen; so step up and
show her her chamber; and I charge you to use her with as much respect
as you would myself, for I have taken a prodigious liking to her, and I
do not know what I shall do for her."

Martha, who was an arch-jade, and, being used to this decoy, had her
cue perfect, made me a kind of half curtsy, and asked me to walk up
with her; and accordingly showed me a neat room, two pair of stairs
backwards, in which there was a handsome bed, where Martha told me I was
to lie with a young gentlewoman, a cousin of my mistress, who she was
sure would be vastly good to me. Then she ran out into such affected
encomiums on her good mistress! her sweet mistress! and how happy I
was to light upon her! and that I could not have bespoke a better; with
other the like gross stuff, such as would itself have started suspicions
in any but such an unpractised simpleton, who was perfectly new to
life, and who took every word she said in the very sense she laid out
for me to take it; but she readily saw what a penetration she had to
deal with, and measured me very rightly in her manner of whistling to
me, so as to make me pleased with my cage, and blind to the wires.

In the midst of these false explanations of the nature of my future
service, we were rung for down again, and I was reintroduced into the
same parlour, where there was a table laid with three covers; and my
mistress had now got with her one of her favourite girls, a notable
manager of her house, and whose business it was to prepare and
break such young fillies as I was to the mounting block; and she was
accordingly, in that view, alloted me for a bed-fellow, and, to give her
the more authority, she had the title of cousin conferred on her by the
venerable president of this college.

Here I underwent a second survey, which ended in the full approbation
of Mrs. Phoebe Ayres, the name of my tutoress elect, to whose care and
instruction I was affectionately recommended.

Dinner was now set on table, and in pursuance of treating me as
a companion, Mrs. Brown, with a tone to cut off all dispute, soon
over-ruled my most humble and most confused protestations against
sitting down with her Ladyship, which my very short breeding just
suggested to me could not be right, or in the order of things.

At table, the conversation was chiefly kept up by the two madams and
carried on in double meaning expressions, interrupted every now and then
by kind assurances to me, all tending to confirm and fix my satisfaction
with my present condition: augment it they could not, so very a novice
was I then.

It was here agreed that I should keep myself up and out of sight for a
few days, till such clothes could be procured for me as were fit for
the character I was to appear in, of my mistress's companion, observing
withal, that on the first impressions of my figure much might depend;
and, as they rightly judged, the prospect of exchanging my country
clothes for London finery, made the clause of confinement digest
perfectly well with me. But the truth was, Mrs. Brown did not care that
I should be seen or talked to by any, either of her customers, or her
Does (as they called the girls provided for them), till she secured a
good market for my maidenhead, which I had at least all the appearances
of having brought into her Ladyship's service.

To slip over minutes of no importance to the main of my story, I pass
the interval to bed time, in which I was more and more pleased with the
views that opened to me, of an easy service under these good people; and
after supper being shewed up to bed, Miss Phoebe, who observed a kind
of reluctance in me to strip and go to bed, in my shift, before her, now
the maid was withdrawn, came up to me, and beginning with unpinning
my handkerchief and gown, soon encouraged me to go on with undressing
myself; and, blushing at now seeing myself naked to my shift, I hurried
to get under the bed-clothes out of sight.

Phoebe laughed and was not long before she placed herself by my side.
She was about five and twenty, by her most suspicious account, in which,
according to all appearances, she must have sunk at least ten good
years; allowance, too, being made for the havoc which a long course of
hackneyship and hot waters must have made of her constitution, and which
had already brought on, upon the spur, that stale stage in which those
of her profession are reduced to think of showing company, instead of
seeing it.

No sooner then was this precious substitute of my mistress laid down,
but she, who was never out of her way when any occasion of lewdness
presented itself, turned to me, embraced and kissed me with great
eagerness. This was new, this was odd; but imputing it to nothing but
pure kindness, which, for ought I knew, it might be the London way to
express in that manner, I was determined not to be behind-hand with her,
and returned her the kiss and embrace, with all the fervour that perfect
innocence knew.

Encouraged by this, her hands became extremely free, and wandered over
my whole body, with touches, squeezes, pressures, that rather warmed and
surprised me with their novelty, than they either shocked or alarmed me.

The flattering praises she intermingled with these invasions,
contributed also not a little to bribe my passiveness; and, knowing no
ill, I feared none, especially from one who had prevented all doubts
of her womanhood, by conducting my hands to a pair of breasts that hung
loosely down, in a size and volume that full sufficiently distinguished
her sex, to me at least, who had never made any other comparison.

I lay then all tame and passive as she could wish, whilst her freedom
raised no other emotion but those of a strange, and, till then, unfelt
pleasure. Every part of me was open and exposed to the licentious
courses of her hands, which, like a lambent fire, ran over my whole
body, and thawed all coldness as they went.

My breasts, if it is not too bold a figure to call so two hard, firm,
rising hillocks, that just began to shew themselves, or signify anything
to the touch, employed and amused her hands awhile, till, slipping down
lower, over a smooth track, she could just feel the soft silky down that
had but a few months before put forth and garnished the mount-pleasant
of those parts, and promised to spread a grateful shelter over the sweet
seat of the most exquisite sensation, and which had been, till that
instant, the seat of the most insensible innocence. Her fingers played
and strove to twine in the young tendrils of that moss, which nature has
contrived at once for use and ornament.

But, not contented with these outer posts, she now attempts the main
spot, and began to twitch, to insinuate, and at length to force an
introduction of a finger into the quick itself, in such a manner, that
had she not proceeded by insensible gradations that inflamed me beyond
the power of modesty to oppose its resistance to their progress, I
should have jumped out of bed and cried for help against such strange
assaults.

Instead of which, her lascivious touches had lighted up a new fire that
wantoned through all my veins, but fixed with violence in that center
appointed them by nature, where the first strange hands were now busied
in feeling, squeezing, compressing the lips, then opening them again,
with a finger between, till an "Oh!" expressed her hurting me, where the
narrowness of the unbroken passage refused it entrance to any depth.

In the meantime, the extension of my limbs, languid stretching, sighs,
short heavings, all conspired to as-ure that experienced wanton that I
was more pleased than offended at her proceedings, which she seasoned
with repeated kisses and exclamations, such as "Oh! what a charming
creature thou art! What a happy man will he be that first makes a woman
of you! Oh! that I were a man for your sake!" with the like broken
expressions, interrupted by kisses as fierce and salacious as ever I
received from the other sex.

For my part, I was transported, confused, and out of myself; feelings so
new were too much for me. My heated and alarmed senses were in a tumult
that robbed me of all liberty of thought; tears of pleasure gushed from
my eyes, and somewhat assuaged the fire that raged all over me.

Phoebe, herself, the hackneyed, thorough-bred Phoebe, to whom all modes
and devices of pleasure were known and familiar, found, it seems,
in this exercise her those arbitrary tastes, for which there is no
accounting. Not that she hated men, or did not even prefer them to her
own sex; but when she met with such occasions as this was, a satiety
of enjoyments in the common road, perhaps, too a great secret bias,
inclined her to make the most of pleasure, wherever she could find it,
without distinction of sexes. In this view, now well assured that she
had, by her touches, sufficiently inflamed me for her purpose, she
rolled down the bed clothes gently, and I saw myself stretched naked,
my shift being turned up to my neck, whilst I had no power or sense to
oppose it. Even my growing blushes expressed more desire than modesty,
whilst the candle, left (to be sure not undesignedly) burning, threw a
full light on my whole body.

"No!" says Phoebe, "you must not, my sweet girl, think to hide all these
treasures from me. My sight must be feasted as my touch. I must devour
with my eyes this springing bosom. Suffer me to kiss it. I have not seen
it enough. Let me kiss it once more. What firm, smooth, white flesh is
here! How delicately shaped! Then this delicious down! Oh! let me view
the small, dear, tender cleft! This is too much, I cannot bear it! I
must! I must!" Here she took my hand, and in a transport carried it
where you will easily guess. But what a difference in the state of the
same thing! A spreading thicket of bushy curls marked the full grown,
complete woman. Then the cavity to which she guided my hand easily
received it; and as soon as she felt it within her, she moved herself to
and fro, with so rapid a friction, that I presently withdrew it, wet
and clammy, when instantly Phoebe grew more composed, after two or
three sighs, and heart-fetched Oh's! and giving me a kiss that seemed to
exhale her soul through her lips, she replaced the bed-clothes over us.
What pleasure she had found I will not say; but this I know, that the
first sparks of kindling nature, the first ideas of pollution, were
caught by me that night; and that the acquaintance and communication
with the bad of our sex, is often as fatal to innocence as all the
seductions of the other. But to go on. When Phoebe was restored to that
calm, which I was far from the enjoyment of myself, she artfully sounded
me on all the points necessary to govern the designs of my virtuous
mistress on me, and by my answers, drawn from pure undissembled nature,
she had no reason but to promise herself all imaginable success, so far
as it depended on my ignorance, easiness and warmth of constitution.

After a sufficient length of dialogue, my bedfellow left me to my rest,
and I fell asleep, through pure weariness, from the violent emotions
I had been led into, when nature which had been too warmly stirred and
fermented to subside without allaying by some means or other relieved
me by one of those luscious dreams, the transports of which are scarce
inferior to those of waking real action.

In the morning I awoke about ten, perfectly gay and refreshed. Phoebe
was up before me, and asked me in the kindest manner how I did, how I
had rested, and if I was ready for breakfast? carefully, at the same
time, avoiding to increase the confusion she saw I was in, at looking
her in the face, by any hint of the night's bed scene. I told her if she
pleased I would get up, and begin any work she would be pleased to set
me about. She smiled; presently the maid brought in the tea equipage,
and I just huddled my clothes on, when in waddled my mistress. I
expected no less than to be told of, if not chid for, my late rising,
when I was most agreeably disappointed by her compliments on my pure
and fresh looks. I was "a bud of beauty" (this was her style), "and how
vastly all the fine men would admire me!" to all which my answers did
not, I can assure you, wrong my breeding; they were as simple and silly
as they could wish, and, no doubt, flattered them infinitely more than
had they proved me enlightened by education and a knowledge of the
world.

We breakfasted, and the tea things were scarce removed, when in were
brought two bundles of linen and wearing apparel: in short, all the
necessaries for rigging me out, as they termed it, completely.

Imagine to yourself, Madam, how my little coquet heart fluttered with
joy at the sight of a white lutestring, flowered with silver, scoured
indeed, but passed on me for spick and span new, a Brussels lace cap,
braited shoes, and the rest in proportion, all second-hand finery, and
procured instantly for the occasion, by the diligence and industry of
the good Mrs. Brown, who had already a chapman for me in the house,
before whom my charms were to pass in review; for he had not only,
in course, insisted on a previous sight of the premises, but also
on immediate surrendering to him, in case of his agreeing for me;
concluding very wisely, that such a place as I was in, was of the
hottest to trust the keeping of such a perishable commodity in, as a
maidenhead.

The care of dressing and tricking me out for the market, was then left
to Phoebe, who acquitted herself, if not well, at least perfectly to the
satisfaction of everything but my impatience of seeing myself dressed.
When it was over, and I viewed myself in the glass, I was no doubt, too
natural, too artless, to hide my childish joy at the change: a change,
in the real truth, for much the worse, since I must have much better
become the neat easy simplicity of my rustic dress than the awkward,
untoward, tawdry finery that I could not conceal my strangeness to.

Phoebe's compliments, however, in which her own share in dressing me was
not forgot, did not a little confirm me in the first notions I had ever
entertained concerning my person; which, be it said without vanity, was
then tolerable to justify a taste for me, and of which it may not be out
of place here to sketch you an unflattered picture.

I was tall, yet not too tall for my age, which, as I before remarked,
was barely turned of fifteen; my shape perfectly straight, thin waisted,
and light and free without owing anything to stays; my hair was a glossy
auburn, and as soft as silk, flowing down my neck in natural curls, and
did not a little to set off the whiteness of a smooth skin; my face was
rather too ruddy, though its features were delicate, and the shape was a
roundish oval, except where a pit on my chin had far from a disagreeable
effect; my eyes were as black as can be imagined, and rather languishing
than sparkling, except on certain occasions, when I have been told they
struck fire fast enough; my teeth, which I ever carefully preserved,
were small, even and white; my bosom was finely raised, and one might
then discern rather the promise than the actual growth of the round,
firm breast, that in a little time made that promise good. In short, all
the points of beauty that are most universally in request, I had, or at
least my vanity forbid me to appeal from the decision of our sovereign
judges the men, who all, that I ever knew at last, gave it thus highly
in my favour; and I met with, even in my own sex, some that were
above denying me that justice, whilst others praised me yet more
unsuspectedly, by endeavouring to detract from me, in points of person
and figure that I obviously excelled in. This is, I own, too strong
of self praise; but I should be ungrateful to nature, and to a form to
which I owe such singular blessings of pleasure and fortune, were I
to suppress, through an affectation of modesty, the mention of such
valuable gifts.

Well then, dressed I was, and little did it then enter into my head
that all this gay attire was no more than decking the victim out for
sacrifice, whilst I innocently attributed all to mere friendship and
kindness in the sweet good Mrs. Brown; who, I was forgetting to mention,
had, under pretence of keeping my money safe, got from me, without the
least hesitation, the driblet (so I now call it) which remained to me
after the expenses of my journey.

After some little time most agreebly spent before the glass, in scarce
self-admiration, since my new dress had by much the greatest share in
it, I was sent for down to the parlour, where the old lady saluted me,
and wished me joy of my new clothes, which she was not ashamed to say,
fitted me as if I had worn nothing but the finest all my life-time; but
what was it she could not see me silly enough to swallow? At the same
time, she presented me to another cousin of her own creation, an elderly
gentleman, who got up, at my entry into the room, and on my dropping a
curtsy to him, saluted me, and seemed a little affronted that I had
only presented my cheek to him: a mistake, which, if one, he immediately
corrected, by gluing his lips to mine, with an ardour which his figure
had not at all disposed me to thank him for: his figure, I say, than
which nothing could be more shocking or detestable: for ugly and
disagreeable were terms too gentle to convey a just idea of it.

Imagine to yourself, a man rather past threescore, short and ill-made,
with a yellow cadaverous hue, great goggle eyes, that stared as if he
was strangled; an out-mouth from two more properly tusks than teeth,
livid lips, and breath like a Jake's: then he had a peculiar ghastliness
in his grin, that made him perfectly frightful, if not dangerous to
women with child; yet, made as he was thus in mock of man, he was
so blind to his own staring deformities, as to think himself born to
please, and that no woman could see him with impunity: in consequence
of which idea, he had lavished great sums on such wretches as could gain
upon themselves to pretend love to his person, whilst to those who had
not art or patience to dissemble the horror it inspired, he behaved even
brutally. Impotence, more than necessity, made him seek in variety, the
provocative that was wanting to raise him to the pitch of enjoyment,
which he too often saw himself baulked of, by the failure of his powers:
and this always threw him into a fit of rage, which he wreaked, as far
as he durst, on the innocent objects of his fit of momentary desire.

This then was the master to which my conscientious benefactress, who had
long been his purveyor in this way, had doomed me, and sent for me down
purposely for his examination. Accordingly she made me stand up before
him, turned me round, unpinned my handkerchief, remarked to him the rise
and fall, the turn and whiteness of a bosom just beginning to fill; then
made me walk, and took even a handle from the rusticity of my charms: in
short, she omitted no point of jockeyship; to which he only answered by
gracious nods of approbation, whilst he looked goats and monkeys at
me: for I sometimes stole a corner glance at him, and encountering his
fiery, eager stare, looked another way from pure horror and affright,
which he, characteristically, attributed to nothing more than maiden
modesty, or at least the affectation of it.

However, I was soon dismissed, and reconducted to my room by Phoebe,
who stuck close to me, not leaving me alone, and at leisure to make such
reflections as might naturally rise to any one, not an idiot, on such a
scene as I had just gone through; but to my shame be it confessed, that
just was my invincible stupidity, or rather portentous innocence, that
I did not yet open my eyes to Mrs. Brown's designs, and saw nothing in
this titular cousin of hers but a shockingly hideous person, which did
not at all concern me, unless that my gratitude for my benefactress made
me extend my respect to all her cousinhood.

Phoebe, however, began to sift the state and pulses of my heart toward
this monster, asking me how I should approve of such a fine gentelman
for a husband. (Fine gentleman, I suppose she called him, from his being
daubed with lace.) I answered her very naturally, that I had no thoughts
of a husband, but that if I was to choose one, it should be among my own
degree, sure! so much had my aversion to that wretch's hideous figure
indisposed me to all "fine gentlemen," and confounded my ideas, as if
those of that rank had been necessarily cast in the same mould that
he was. But Phoebe was not to be put off so, but went on with her
endeavours to melt and soften me for the purposes of my reception into
that hospitable house: and whilst she talked of the sex in general, she
had no reason to despair of a compliance, which more than one reason
showed her would be easily enough obtained of me; but then she had too
much experience not to discover that my particular fixed aversion to
that frightful cousin would be a block not so readily to be removed, as
suited the consummation of their bargain, and sale of me.

Mother Brown had in the meantime agreed the terms with this loquorice
old goat, which I afterwards understood were to be fifty guineas
peremptory, for the liberty of attempting me, and a hundred more at the
complete gratification of his desires, in the triumph over my virginity:
and as for me, I was to be left entirely at the discretion of his liking
and generosity. This unrighteous contract being thus settled, he was so
eager to be put in possession, that he insisted on being introduced to
drink tea with me that afternoon, when we were to be left alone; nor
would he hearken to the procuress's remonstrances, that I was not
sufficiently prepared, and ripened for such an attack; that I was too
green and untamed, having been scarce twenty-four hours in the house:
it is the character of lust to be impatient, and his vanity arming him
against any supposition of other than the common resistance of a maid
on those occasions, made him reject all proposals of a delay, and my
dreadful trial was thus fixed, unknown to me, for that very evening.

At dinner, Mrs. Brown and Phoebe did nothing but run riot in praise of
this wonderful cousin, and how happy that woman would be that he would
favour with his addresses; in short my two gossips exhausted all
their rhetoric to persuade me to accept them: "that the gentleman was
violently smitten with me at first sight; that he would make my fortune
if I would be a good girl and not stand in my own light; that I should
trust his honour; that I should be made for ever, and have a chariot to
go abroad in," with all such stuff as was fit to turn the head of such
a silly ignorant girl as I then was: but luckily here my aversion had
taken already such deep root in me, my heart was so strongly defended
from him by my senses, that wanting the art to mask my sentiments, I
gave them no hopes of their employer succeeding, at least very easily,
with me. The glass too marched pretty quick, with a view, I suppose, to
make a friend of the warmth of my constitution, in the minutes of the
imminent attack.

Thus they kept me pretty long at table, and about six in the evening,
after I had retired to my apartment, and the tea board was set, enters
my venerable mistress, followed close by that satyr, who came in
grinning in a way peculiar to him, and by his odious presence, confirmed
me in all the sentiments of detestation which his first appearance had
given birth to.

He sat down fronting me, and all tea time kept ogling me in a manner
that gave me the utmost pain and confusion, all the mark of which he
still explained to be my bashfulness, and not being used to see company.

Tea over, the commoding old lady pleady urgent business (which indeed
was true) to go out, and earnestly desired me to entertain her cousin
kindly till she came back, both for my own sake and her; and then, with
a "Pray, sir, be very good, be very tender to the sweet child," she went
out of the room, leaving me staring, with my mouth open, and unprepared
by the suddenness of her departure, to oppose it.

We were now alone; and on that idea a sudden fit of trembling seized
me. I was so afraid, without a precise notion of why, and what I had
to fear, that I sat on the settee, by the fire side, motionless and
petrified, without life or spirit, not knowing how to look or how to
stir.

But long I was not suffered to remain in this state of stupefaction: the
monster squatted down by me on the settee, and without farther ceremony
or preamble, flings his arms about my neck, and drawing me pretty
forcibly towards him, obliged me to receive, in spite of my struggles
to disengage from him, his pestilential kisses, which quite overcame me.
Finding me then next to senseless, and unresisting, he tears off my neck
handkerchief, and laid all open there, to his eyes and hands: still
I endured all without flinching, till emboldened by my sufferance and
silence, for I had not the power to speak or cry out, he attempted to
lay me down on the settee, and I felt his hand on the lower part of my
naked thighs, which were crossed, and which he endeavoured to unlock. Oh
then! I was roused out of my passive endurance, and springing from him
with an activity he was not prepared for, threw myself at his feet, and
begged him, in the most moving tone, not to be rude, and that he would
not hurt me. "Hurt you, my dear?" says the brute, "I intend you no
harm. Has not the old lady told you that I love you? that I shall do
handsomely by you?"

"She has indeed, sir," said I, "but I cannot love you, indeed I cannot!
pray let me alone! yes! I will love you dearly if you will let me alone
and go away." But I was talking to the wind, for whether my tears,
my attitude, or the disorder of my dress proved fresh incentives, or
whether he was now under the dominion of desires he could not bridle,
but snorting and foaming with lust and rage, he renews his attack,
seizes me, and again attempts to extend and fix me on the settee:
in which he succeeded so far as to lay me along, and even to toss my
petticoats over my head, and lay my thighs bare, which I obstinately
kept close, nor could he, though he attempted with his knee to force
them open, effect it so as to stand fair for being master of the main
avenue; he was unbuttoned, both waistcoat and breeches, yet I only
felt the weight of his body upon me, whilst I lay struggling with
indignation, and dying with terrors; but he stopped all of a sudden, and
got off, panting, blowing, cursing, and repeating "old and ugly!" for so
I had very naturally called him in the heat of my defence.

The brute had, it seems, as I afterwards understood, brought on, by
his eagerness and struggle, the ultimate period of his hot fit of
lust, which his power was too short-lived to carry him through the full
execution of; of which my thighs and linen received the effusion.

When it was over he bid me, with a tone of displeasure, get up: "that he
would not do me the honour to think of me any more; that the old b----h
might look out for another cully; that he would not be fooled so by
ever a country mock modesty in England; that he supposed I had left my
maidenhead with some hobnail in the country, and was come to dispose of
my skim-milk in town" with a volley of the like abuse; which I listened
to with more pleasure than ever fond woman did to protestations of
love from her darling minion: for, incapable as I was of receiving any
addition to my perfect hatred and aversion to him, I looked on this
railing, as my security against his renewing his most odious caress.

Yet, plain as Mrs. Brown's views were now come out, I had not the
heart, or spirit to open my eyes to them: still I could not part with
my dependence on that beldam, so much did I think myself hers, soul and
body: or rather, I sought to deceive myself with the continuation of my
good opinion of her, and choose to wait the worst at her hands, sooner
than be turned out to starve in the streets, without a penny of money or
a friend to apply to these fears were my folly.

While this confusion of ideas was passing in my head, and I sat
pensively by the fire, with my eyes brimming with tears, my neck still
bare, and my cap fallen off in the struggle, so that my hair was in the
disorder you may guess, the villain's lust began, I suppose, to be again
in flow, at the sight of all that bloom of youth which presented itself
to his view, a bloom yet unenjoyed, and of course not yet indifferent to
him.

After some pause, he asked me with a tone of voice mightily softer,
whether I would make it up with him before the old lady returned, and
all should be well; he would restore me to his affections, at the
same time offering to kiss me and feel my breasts. But now my extreme
aversion, my fears, my indignation, all acting upon me, gave me a spirit
not natural to me, so that breaking loose from him, I ran to the bell
and rang it, with such violence and effect as to bring up the maid to
know what was the matter, or whether the gentleman wanted anything; and
before he could proceed to greater extremities, she bounced into the
room, and seeing me stretched on the floor, my hair all dishevelled, my
nose gushing out blood, which did not a little tragedize the scene, and
my odious persecutor still intent of pushing his brutal point, unmoved
by all my cries and distress, she was herself confounded and did not
know what to do.

As much, however, as Martha might be prepared and hardened to
transactions of this sort, all womanhood must have been out of her heart
could she have seen this unmoved. Besides that, on the face of things,
she imagined that matters had gone greater lengths than they really had,
and that the courtesy of the house had been actually consummated on me,
and flung: me into the condition I was in: in this notion she instantly
took my part, and advised the gentleman to go down and leave me to
recover myself, and "that all would be soon over with me; that when
Mrs. Brown and Phoebe, who were gone out, were returned, they would take
order for everything to his satisfaction; that nothing would be lost by
a little patience with the poor tender thing; that for her part she was
frightened; she could not tell what to say to such doings; but that she
would stay by me till my mistress came home." As the wench said all
this in a resolute tone, and the monster himself began to perceive that
things would not mend by his staying, he took his hat and went out of
the room murmuring and pitting his brows like an old ape, so that I was
delivered from the horrors of his detestable presence.

As soon as he was gone, Martha very tenderly offered me her assistance
in anything, and would have got me some hartshorn drops and put me to
bed; which last I, at first, positively refused, in the fear that the
monster might return and take me at that disadvantage. However, with
much persuasion and assurances that I should not be molested that night
she prevailed on me to lie down; and indeed I was so weakened by my
struggles, so dejected by my fearful apprehension, so terror-struck,
that I had not power to sit up, or hardly to give answers to the
questions with which the curious Martha plied and perplexed me.

Such too, and so cruel was my fate, that I dreaded the sight of Mrs.
Brown, as if I had been the criminal, and she the person injured; a
mistake which you will not think so strange, on distinguishing that
neither virtue nor principles had the least share in the defence I had
made, but only the particular aversion I had conceived against this
first brutal and frightful invader of my tender innocence.

I passed then the time till Mrs. Brown came home, under all the
agitations of fear and despair that may easily be guessed.

About eleven at night my two ladies came home, and having received
rather a favourable account from Martha, who had run down to let them
in, for Mr. Crofts (that was the name of my brute) was gone out of the
house, after waiting till he had tired his patience for Mrs. Brown's
return, they came thundering up stairs, and seeing me pale, my face
bloody, and all the marks of the most thorough dejection, they employed
themselves more to comfort and re-inspirit me than in making me the
reproaches I was weak enough to fear, I who had so many juster and
stronger to retort upon them.

Mrs. Brown withdrawn, Phoebe came presently to bed to me, and what
with the answers she drew from me, what with her own method of palpably
satisfying herself, she soon discovered that I had been more frightened
than hurt; upon which I suppose, being herself seized with sleep, and
reserving her lectures and instructions till the next morning, she left
me, properly speaking, to my unrest; for, later tossing and turning
the greatest part of the night, and tormenting myself with the falsest
notions and apprehensions of things, I fell, through mere fatigue into
a kind of delirious doze, out of which I waked late in the morning, in
a violent fever: a circumstance which was extremely critical to reprieve
me, at least for a time, from the attacks of a wretch, infinitely more
terrible to me than death itself.

The interested care that was taken of me during my illness, in order to
restore me to a condition of making good the bawd's engagements, or of
enduring further trials, had, however, such an effect on my grateful
disposition that I even thought myself obliged to my un-doers for their
attention to promote my recovery; and, above all, for the keeping out
of my sight of that brutal ravisher, the author of my disorder, on their
finding I was too strongly moved at the bare mention of his name.

Youth is soon raised, and a few days were sufficient to conquer the fury
of my fever: but, what contributed most to my perfect recovery and to my
reconciliation with life, was the timely news that Mr. Crofts, who was a
merchant of considerable dealings, was arrested at the King's suit,
for nearly forty thousand pounds, on account of his driving a certain
contraband trade, and that his affairs were so desperate, that even were
it in his inclination, it would not be in his power to renew his designs
upon me: for he was instantly thrown into a prison, which it was not
likely he would get out of in haste.

Mrs. Brown, who had touched his fifty guineas, advanced to so little
purpose, and lost all hopes of the remaining hundred, began to look upon
my treatment of him with a more favourable eye; and as they had observed
my temper to be perfectly tractable and conformable to their views, all
the girls that composed her flock were suffered to visit me, and had
their cue to dispose me, by their conversation, to a perfect resignation
of myself to Mrs. Brown's direction.

Accordingly they were let in upon me, and all that frolic and
thoughtless gaiety in which those giddy creatures consume either
leisure, made me envy a condition of which I only saw the fair side;
insomuch, that the being one of them became even my ambition: a
disposition which they all carefully cultivated; and I wanted now
nothing but to restore my health, that I might be able to undergo the
ceremony of the initiation.

Conversation, example, in short all, contributed, in that house, to
corrupt my native parity, which had taken no root in education; whilst
now the inflammable principal of pleasure, so easily fired at my age,
made strange work within me, and all the modesty I was brought up in the
habit, not the instruction of, began to melt away like dew before the
sun's heat; not to mention that I made a vice of necessity, from the
constant fears I had of being turned out to starve.

I was soon pretty well recovered, and at certain hours allowed to range
all over the house, but cautiously kept from seeing any company till the
arrival of Lord B----, from Bath, to whom Mrs. Brown, in respect to his
experienced generosity on such occasions, proposed to offer the perusal
of that trinket of mine, which bears so great an imaginary value; and
his lordship being expected in town in less than a fortnight, Mrs. Brown
judged I would be entirely renewed in beauty and freshness by that time,
and afforded her the chance of a better bargain than she had driven with
Mr. Crofts.

In the meantime, I was so thoroughly, as they call it, brought over, so
tame to their whistle, that, had my cage door been set open, I had no
idea that I ought to fly anywhere, sooner than stay where I was; nor had
I the least sense of regretting my condition, but waited very quietly
for whatever Mrs. Brown should order concerning me; who on her side, by
herself and her agents, took more than the necessary precautions to lull
and lay asleep all just reflections on my destiny.

Preachments of morality over the left shoulder; a life of joy painted in
the gayest colours; caresses, promises, indulgent treatment; nothing,
in short, was wanting to domesticate me entirely and to prevent my going
out anywhere to get better advice. Alas! I dreamed of no such thing.

Hitherto I had been indebted only to the girls of the house for the
corruption of my innocence: their luscious talk, in which modesty was
far from respected, their description of their engagements with men,
had given me a tolerable insight into the nature and mysteries of their
profession, at the same time that they highly provoked an itch of florid
warm-spirited blood through every vein: but above all, my bed fellow
Phoebe, whose pupil I more immediately was, exerted her talents in
giving me the first tinctures of pleasure: whilst nature, now warmed
and wantoned with discoveries so interesting, piqued a curiosity which
Phoebe artfully whetted, and leading me from question to question of her
own suggestion, explained to me all the mysteries of Venus. But I could
not long remain in such a house as that, without being an eye-witness of
more than I could conceive from her descriptions.

One day, about twelve at noon, being thoroughly recovered of my fever, I
happened to be in Mrs. Brown's dark closet, where I had not been half
an hour, resting upon the maid's bed, before I heard a rustling in the
bed-chamber, separated from the closet only by two sash doors, before
the glasses of which were drawn two yellow damask curtains, but not so
close as to exclude the full view of the room from any person in the
closet.

I instantly crept softly and posted myself so, that seeing everything
minutely, I could not myself be seen; and who should come in but the
venerable mother Abbess herself! handed in by a tall, brawny young
Horse-grenadiers, moulded in the Hercules style: in fine, the choice of
the most experienced dame, in those affairs, in all London.

Oh! how still and hush did I keep at my stand, lest any noise should
baulk my curiosity, or bring Madam into the closet!

But I had not much reason to fear either, for she was entirely taken up
with her present great concern, that she had no sense of attention to
spare to anything else.

Droll was it to see that clumsy fat figure of her's flop down on the
foot of the bed, opposite to the closet door so that I had a full front
view of all her charms.

Her paramour sat down by her: he seemed to be a man of very few words,
and a great stomach; for proceeding instantly to essentials, he gave her
some hearty smacks, and thrusting his hands into her breasts, disengaged
them from her stays, in scorn of whose confinement they broke loose, and
sagged down, navel-low at least. A more enormous pair did my eyes
never behold, nor of a worse colour, flagging, soft, and most lovingly
contiguous: yet such as they were, this great beef-eater seemed to paw
them with a most unenviable lust, seeking in vain to confine or cover
one of them with a hand scarce less than a shoulder of mutton. After
toying with them thus some time, as if they had been worth it, he laid
her down pretty briskly, and canting up her petticoats, made barely
a mask of them to her broad red face, that blushed with nothing but
brandy.

As he stood on one side, unbuttoning his waistcoat and breeches, her fat
brawny thighs hung down, and the whole greasy landscape lay fairly open
to my view; a wide open mouthed gap, overshaded with a grizzly bush,
seemed held out like a beggar's wallet for its provision.

But I soon had my eyes called off by a more striking object that
entirely engrossed them.

Her sturdy stallion had now unbuttoned, and produced naked, stiff and
erect, that wonderful machine, which I had never seen before, and which,
for the interest my own seat of pleasure began to take furiously in it,
I stared at with all the eyes I had: however, my senses were too much
flurried, too much concentered in that now burning spot of mine,
to observe anything more than in general the make and turn of that
instrument; from which the instinct of nature, yet more than all I had
heard of it, now strongly informed me, I was to expect that supreme
pleasure which she had placed in the meeting of those parts so admirably
fitted for each other.

Long, however, the young spark did not remain before giving it two or
three shakes, by way of brandishing it, he threw himself upon her, and
his back being now towards me, I could only take his being ingulphed for
granted, by the directions he moved in, and the impossibility of missing
so staring a mark; and now the bed shook, the curtains rattled so that
I could scarce hear the sighs and murmurs, the heaves and pantings that
accompanied the action, from the beginning to the end; the sound and
sight of which thrilled to the very soul of me, and made every vein of
my body circulate liquid fires: the emotion grew so viol-lent that it
almost intercepted my respiration.

Prepared then, and disposed as I was by the discourse of my companions,
and Phoebe's minute detail of everything, no wonder that such a sight
gave the last dying blow to my native innocence.

Whilst they were in the heat of the action, guided by nature only, I
stole my hand up my petticoats, and with fingers on fire, seized and yet
more inflamed that center of all my senses: my heart palpitated, as if
it would force its way through my bosom: I breathed with pain; I twisted
my thighs, squeezed and compressed the lips of that virgin slit, and
following mechanically the example of Phoebe's manual operation on
it, as far as I could find admission, brought on at last the critical
ecstasy, the melting flow, into which nature, spent with excess of
pleasure, dissolves and dies away.

After which, my senses recovered coolness enough to observe the rest of
the transaction between this happy pair.

The young fellow had just dismounted, when the old lady immediately
sprung up, with all the vigour of youth, derived, no doubt, from her
late refreshment; and making him sit down, began in her turn to kiss
him, to pat and pinch his cheeks, and play with his hair: all which he
received with an air of indifference and coolness that showed him to be
much altered from what he was when he first went on to the breach.

My pious governess, however, not being above calling in auxiliaries,
unlocks a little case of cordials that stood near the bed, and made him
pledge her in a very plentiful dram: after which, and a little amorous
parley, Madam set herself down upon the same place, at the bed's foot;
and the young fellow standing sidewise by her, she, with the greatest
effrontery imaginable, unbuttons his breeches, and removing his shirt,
draws out his affair, so shrunk and diminished, that I could not but
remember the difference, now crest-fallen, or just faintly lifting
its head: but our experience matron very soon, by chaffing it with her
hands, brought it to swell to that size and erection I had before seen
it up to.

I admired then, upon a fresh account, and with a nicer survey, the
texture of that capital part of man: the flaming red head as it stood
uncapt, the whiteness of the shaft, and the shrub growth of curling hair
that embrowned the foots of it, the roundish bag that dangled down from
it, all exacted my eager attention, and renewed my flame. But, as the
main affair was now at the point the industrious dame had laboured to
bring it to, she was not in the humour to put off the payment of her
pains, but laying herself down, drew him gently upon her, and thus they
finished, in the same manner as before, the old last act.

This over, they both went out lovingly together, the old lady having
first made him a present, as near as I could observe, of three or four
pieces; he being not only her particular favourite on account of his
performances, but a retainer to the house; from whose sight she had
taken great care hitherto to secret me, lest he might not have had
patience to wait for my lord's arrival, but have insisted on being his
taster, which the old lady was under too much subjection to him to dare
dispute with him; for every girl of the house fell to him in course,
and the old lady only now and then got her turn, in consideration of the
maintenance he had, and which he could scarce be accused of not earning
from her.

As soon as I heard them go down-stairs, I stole up softly to my own
room, out of which I had luckily not been missed; there I began to
breathe more free, and to give a loose to those warm emotions which the
sight of such an encounter had raised in me, I laid me down on the bed,
stretched myself out, joining and ardently wishing, and requiring any
means to divert or allay the rekindled rage and tumult of my desires,
which all pointed strongly to their pole: man. I felt about the bed as
if I sought for something that I grasped in my waking dream, and not
finding it, could have cried for vexation; every part of me plowing with
simulated fires. At length, I resorted to the only present remedy, that
of vain attempts at digitation, where the small-ness of the theatre did
not yet afford room enough for action, and where the pain my fingers
gave me, in striving for admission, though they procured me a slight
satisfaction for the present, started an apprehension which I could not
be easy till I had communicated to Phoebe and received her explanations
upon it.

The opportunity, however, did not offer till next morning, for Phoebe
did not come to bed till long after I was gone to sleep. As soon then as
we were both awake, it was but in course to bring our ly-a-bed chat to
hand, on the subject of my uneasiness: to which a recital of the love
scene I had thus, by chance, been spectatress of, served for a preface.

Phoebe could not hear it to the end without more than one interruption
by peals of laughter, and my ingenuous way of relating matters did not a
little heighten the joke to her.

But, on her sounding me how the sight had affected me, without mincing
or hiding the pleasurable emotions it had inspired me with, I told
her at the same time that one remark had perplexed me, and that very
considerably. "Aye!" says she, "what was that?" "Why," replied I,
"having very curiously and attentively compared the size of that
enormous machine, which did not appear, at least to my fearful
imagination, less than my wrist, and at least three of my hand-fuls
long, to that of the tender small part of me which was framed to receive
it, I could not conceive its being possible to afford it entrance
without dying, perhaps in the greatest pain, since she well knew
that even a finger thrust in there hurt me beyond bearing. As to my
mistress's and yours, I can very plainly distinguish the different
dimensions of them from mine, palpable to the touch, and visible to
the eye; so that, in short, great as the promised pleasure may be, I am
afraid of the pain of the experiment."

Phoebe at this redoubled her laugh, and whilst I expected a very serious
solution of my doubts and apprehensions in this matter, only told me
that "she never heard of a mortal wound being given in those parts, by
that terrible weapon, and that some she knew younger, and as delicately
made as myself, had outlived the operation; that she believed, at the
worst, I should take a great deal of liking; that true it was, there was
a great diversity of sizes in those parts, owing to nature, child-bearing,
frequent over-stretching with unmerciful machines, but that at a certain
age and habit of body, even the most experienced in those affairs could
not well distinguish between the maid and the woman, supposing too an
absence of all artifice, in their natural situation: but that since
chance had thrown in my way one sight of that sort, she would procure me
another, that should feast my eyes more delicately, and go a great way
in the cure of my fears from that imaginary disproportion".

On this she asked me if I knew Polly Phillips? "Undoubterly," says I,
"the fair girl which was so tender of me when I was sick, and has been,
as you told me, but two months in the house." "The same," says Phoebe.
"You must know then, she is kept by a young Genoes merchant, whom his
uncle, who is immensely rich, and whose darling he is, on a pretex of
settling some accounts, but in reality to humour his inclinations for
travelling, and seeing the world. He met casually with this Polly once
in company, and taking a likning to her, makes it worth her while to
keep entirely to him. He comes to her here twice or thrice a week, and
she receives him in the light closet up one pair of stairs, where he
enjoys her in a taste, I suppose, peculiar to the heat, or perhaps the
caprices of his own country, I say no more, but to-morrow being his day,
you shall see what passes between them, from a place only known to your
mistress and myself."

You may be sure, in the ply I was now taking, I had no objection to the
proposal, and was rather a tip-toe for its accomplishments.

At five in the evening next day, Phoebe, punctual to her promise, came
to me as I sat alone in my own room, and beckoned me to follow her.

We went down the back stairs very softly, and opening the door of a
dark closet, where there was some old furniture kept, and some cases of
liquor, she drew me in after her, and fastened the door upon us, we had
no light but what came through a long crevice in the partition between
ours and the light closet, where the scene of action lay; so that
sitting on those low cases, we could, with the greatest ease, as well as
clearness, see all objects (ourselves unseen), only by applying our
eyes close to the crevice, where the moulding of a panel had warped, or
started a little on the other side.

The young gentleman was the first person I saw, with his back directly
towards me, looking at a print. Polly was not yet come: in less than a
minute though, the door opened, and she came in; and at the noise the
door made he turned about, and come to meet her, with an air of the
greatest tenderness and satisfaction.

After saluting her, he led her to a coach that fronted us, where they
both sat down, and the young Genoes helped her to a glass of wine, with
some Naples biscuits on a salver.

Presently, when they had exchanged a few kisses, and questions in broken
English on one side, he began to unbutton, and, in fine, stript unto his
shirt.

As if this had been the signal agreed on for pulling off all their
clothes, a scheme which the heat of the season perfectly favoured, Polly
began to draw her pins, and as she had no stays to unlace, she was in a
trice, with her gallant's officious assistance, undressed to all but her
shift.

When he saw this, his breeches were immediately loosened, waist and
knee bands, and slipped over his ankles, clean off; his shirt collar was
unbottoned too: then, first giving Polly an encouraging kiss, he stole,
as it were, the shift off the girl, who being, I suppose, broke and
familiarized to this humour, blushed indeed, but less than I did at the
apparition of her, now standing stark naked, just as she came ont of
the hands of pure nature, with her black hair loose and a-float down her
dazzling white neck and shoulders, whilst the deepened carnation of her
cheeks went off gradually into the hue of glazed snow: for such were the
blended tints polish of her skin.

This girl could not be above eighteen: her face regular and sweet
featured, her shape exquisite; nor could I help envying her two ripe
enchanting breasts, finely plumped out in flesh, but withal so round, so
firm, that they sustained themselves, in scorn of any stay: then their
nipples, pointing different ways, marked their pleasing separation;
beneath them lay the delicious tract of the belly, which terminated in
a parting of rift scarce discerning, that modesty seemed to retire
downward, and seek shelter between two plump fleshy thighs: the curling
hair that overspread its delightful front, clothed it with the richest
sable fur in the universe: in short, she was evidently a subject for the
painters to court her, sitting to them for a pattern female beauty, in
all the true pride and pomp of nakedness.

The young Italian (still in his shirt) stood gazing and transported at
the sight of beauties that might have fired a dying hermit; his eager
eyes devoured her, as she shifted attitudes at his discretion: neither
were his hands excluded their share of the high feast, but wandered, on
the hunt of pleasure, over every part and inch of her body, so qualified
to afford the most exquisite sense of it.

In the mean time time, one could not help observing the swell of his
shirt before, that bolstered out, and pointed out the condition of
things behind the curtain: but he soon removed it, by slipping his shirt
over his head; and now, as to nakedness, they had nothing to reproach
one another.

The young gentleman, by Phoebe's guess, was about two and twenty; tall
and well limbed. His body was finely formed, and of a most vigorous
make, square shouldered, and broad chested: his face was not remarkable
any way, but for a nose inclining to the Roman, eyes large, black, and
sparkling, and a ruddiness in his cheeks that was the more a grace; for
his complexion was of the brownest, not of that dusky dun colour which
excludes, the idea of freshness, but of that clear, olive gloss, which
glowing with life, dazzles perhaps less than fairness, and yet pleases
more, when it pleases at all. His hair being too short to tie fell no
lower than his neck, in short easy curls; and he had a few sprigs about
his paps, that garnished his chest in a style of strength and manliness.
Then his grand movement, which seemed to rise out of a thicket of
curling hair, that spread from the root all over his thighs and belly up
to the navel, stood stiff and upright, but of a size to frighten me, by
sympathy for the small tender part which was the object of its fury,
and which now lay exposed to my fairest view; for he had, immediately
on stoppings off his shirt, gently pushed her down on the couch, which
stood conveniently to break her willing fall. Her thighs were spread out
to their utmost extention, and discovered between them the mark of the
sex, the red-centered cleft of flesh, whose lips vermillioning inwards,
expressed a small ruby line in sweet miniature, such as Guide's touch or
colouring: could never attain to the life or delicacy of.

Phoebe, at this, gave me a gentle jog, to prepare me for a whisper
question: "Whether I thought my little maiden-head was much less?" But
my attention was too much engrossed, too much inwrapped with all I saw,
to be able to give her any answer.

By this time the young gentelman had changed her posture from lying
breadth to length-wise on the coach: but her thighs were still spread,
and the mark lay fair for him, who now kneeling between them, displayed
to us a side view of that fierce erect machine of his, which threatened
no less than splitting the tender victim, who lay smiling at the
uplifted stroke, nor seemed to decline it. He looked upon his weapon
himself with some pleasure, and guiding it with his hand to the
inviting; slit, drew aside the lips, and lodged it (after some thrusts,
which Polly seemed even to assist) about half way; but there it stuck, I
suppose from its growing thickness: he draws it again, and just wetting
it with spittle, re-enters, and with ease sheathed it now up to the
hilt, at which Polly gave a deep sigh, which was quite another tone than
one of pain; he thrusts, she heaves, at first gently, and in a regular
cadence; but presently the transport began to be too violent to observe
any order or measure; their motions were too rapid, their kisses too
fierce' and fervent for nature to support such fury long: both seemed to
me out of themselves: their eyes darted fires: "Oh! oh! I can't bear it.
It is too much. I die. I am going," were Polly's expressions of extasy:
his joys were more silent: but soon broken murmurs, sighs heart-fetched,
and at length a dispatching thrust, as if he would have forced himself
up her body, and then the motionless languor of all his limbs, all
shewed that the die-away moment was come upon him; which she gave signs
of joining with by, the wild throwing of her hands about, closing her
eyes, and giving a deep sob, in which she seemed to expire in an agony
of bliss.

When he had finished his stroke, and got from off her, she lay still
without the least motion, breathless, as it should seem, with pleasure.
He replaced her again breadth-wise on the couch, unable to sit up, with
her thighs open, between which I could observe a kind of white liquid,
like froth, hanging about the outward lips of that recently opened
wound, which now glowed with a deeper red. Presently she gets up, and
throwing her arms round him, seemed far undelighted with the trial he
had put her to, to judge, at least by the fondness with which she eyed,
and hung upon him.

For my part, I will not pretend to describe what I felt over me during
this scene; but from that instant, adieu all fears of what man can
do unto me! they were now changed into such ardent desires, such
ungovernable longings, that I could have by the sleeve, and offered him
the bauble, which I now imagined the loss of would be a gain I could not
too soon procure myself.

Phoebe, who had more experience, and to whom such sights were not so
new, could not however, be unmoved at so warm a scene; and drawing me
away softly from the peeping hole, for fear of being overheard, guided
me as the door as possible, all passive and obedient to her least
signals.

Here was no room either to sit or lie, but making me stand with my back
towards the door, she lifted up my petticoats, and with her busy fingers
fell to visit and explore that part of me, where I was perfectly sick
and ready to die with desire; that the bare touch of her finger, in
that critical place, had the effect of a fire to a train, and her hand
instantly made her sensible to what a pitch I was wound up, and melted
by the sight she had thus procured me. Satisfied then with her success,
in allaying a heat that would have made me impatient of seeing the
continuation of the transactions between our amourous couple, she
brought me again to the crevice, so favourable to our curiosity.

We had certainly been but a few instants away from it, and yet on our
return we saw everything in good forwardness for recommencing the tender
hostilities.

The young foreigner was sitting down, fronting us, on the coach, with
Polly upon one knee, who had her arms round his neck, whilst the extreme
whiteness of her skin was not undelightfully contrasted by the smooth
glossy brown of her lover's.

But who could count the fierce, unnumbered kisses given and taken?
In which I could often discover their mouths were double tongued,
and seemed to favour the mutual insertion with the greatest gust and
delight.

In the meantime, his red-headed champion, that had so lately fled the
pit, quelled and abashed, was now recovered to the top of his condition,
perked and crested up between Polly's thighs, who was not wanting, on
her part, to coax and keep it in good humour, stroking it, with her
head down, and receiving even its velvet tip between the lips of not
its proper mouth: whether it was to render it more glib and easy of
entrance, I could not tell; but it had such an effect, that the young
gentleman seemed by his eyes, that sparkled with more excited lustre,
and his inflamed countenance, to receive increase of pleasure. He got
up, and taking Polly in his arms, embraced her, and said something too
softly for me to hear, leading her withal to the foot of the couch, and
taking delight to slap her thighs and posteriors with that stiff sinew
of his, which hit them with a spring that he gave it with his hand, and
made them resound again, but her about as much as he meant to hurt her,
for she seemed to have as frolic a taste as himself.

But guess my surprise, when I saw the lazy young rogue lie down on his
back, and gently pull down Polly upon him, who giving way to his humour,
stradled, and with her hands conducted her blind favourite to the right
place; and following her impulse, ran directly upon the flaming point of
this weapon of pleasure, which she staked herself upon, up pierced, and
infixed to the extremest hair breadth of it: thus she sat on him a few
instants, enjoying and relishing her situation, whilst he toyed with
her provoking breasts. Sometimes she would stoop to meet his kiss: but
presently the sting of pleasure spurred them up to fiercer action; then
began the storm of heaves, which, from the undermost combatant, were
thrust at the same time, he crossing his hands over her, and drawing
her home to him with a sweet violence: the inverted strokes of anvil
over hammer soon brought on the critical period, in which all the signs
of a close conspiring extasy informed us of the point they were at.

For me, I could bear to see no more; I was so overcome, so inflamed at
the second part of the same play, that, mad to an intolerable degree,
I hugged, I clasped Phoebe, as if she had wherewithal to relieve me.
Pleased however with, and pitying the taking she could feel me in, she
drew towards the door, and opening it softly as she could, we both got
off undiscovered, and reconducted me to my own room, where, unable to
keep my legs, in the agitation I was in, I instantly threw myself down
on the bed, where I lay transported, though ashamed at what I felt.

Phoebe lay down by me, and asked me archly, "if, now that I had seen
the enemy, and fully considered him, I was still afraid of him? or did
I think I could come to a close engagement with him?" To all which, not a
word on my side; I sighed, and could scarcely breathe. She takes hold
of my hand, and having rolled up her own petticoats, forced it half
strivingly, towards those parts, where, now grown more knowing, I missed
the main object of my wishes; and finding not even the shadow of what I
wanted, where every thing was so fiat, or so hollow, in the vexation
I was in at it. I should have withdrawn my hand, but for fear of
disobliging her. Abandoning it then entirely to her management, she made
use of it as she thought proper, to procure herself rather the shadow
than the substance of any pleasure. For my part, I now pined for more
solid food, and promised tacitly to myself that I would not be put off
much longer with this foolery of woman to woman, of Mrs. Brown did not
soon provide me with the essential specific. In short, I had all the air
of not being able to wait the arrival of my lord B----, though he was
now expected in a very fews days: nor did I wait for him, for love
itself took charge of the disposal of me, in spite of interest, or gross
lust.

It was now two days after the closet scene, that I got up about six in
the morning, and leaving my bedfellow fast asleep, stole down, with no
other thought than of taking a little fresh air in a small garden, which
our back parlour opened into, and from which my confinement debarred me,
at the times company came to my house; but now sleep and silence reigned
all over it.

I opened the parlour door, and well surprised was I at seeing, by the
side of a fire half-out, a young gentleman in the old lady's elbow
chair, with his legs laid upon another, fast asleep, and left there by
his thoughtless companions, who had drank him down, and then went off
with every one but his mistress, whilst he stayed behind by the courtesy
of the old matron, who would not disturb or turn him out in that
condition at one in the morning; and beds, it is more than probable
there were none to spare. On the table still remained the punch bowl and
glasses, stewed about in their usual disorder after a drunken revel.

But when I drew nearer, to view the sleeping estray, heavens! what
a sight! No! term of years, no turn of fortune could ever eraze the
lightninglike impression his form made on me. Yes! dearest object of
my earliest passion, I command for ever the remembrance of thy first
appearance to my ravished eyes, it calls thee up, present; and I see
thee now.

Figure to yourself, Madam, fair stripling between eighteen and nineteen,
with his head reclined on one of the sides of the chair, his hair
disordered curls, irregularly shading a face, on which all the roseate
bloom of youth and all the manly graces conspired to fix my eye
sand heart; even the languour and paleness of his face, in which the
momentary triumph of the lily over the rose was owing to the excesses
of the night, gave an inexpressible sweetness to the finest features
imaginable: his eyes, closed in sleep, displayed the meeting edges of
their lids beautifully bordered with long eye-lashes; over which no
pencil could have described two more regular arches than those that
graced his forehead, which was high, perfectly white and smooth; then a
pair of vermilion lips, pouting and swelling to the touch, as if a bee
had freshly stung them, seemed to challenge me to get the gloves off
this lovely sleeper, had not the modesty and respect, which in both
sexes are inseparable from a true passion, checked my impulses.

But on seeing his shirt collar unbottoned, and bosom whiter than a drift
of snow, the pleasure of considering it could not bribe me to lengthen
it, at the hazard of a health that began to be my life's concern. Love,
that made me timid, taught me to be tender too: with a trembling hand
I took hold of one of his, and waking him as gently as possible, he
started, and looking, at first a little wildly, said with a voice that
sent its harmonious sound to my heart: "Pray, child, what-a-clock is
it?" I told him, and added that he might catch cold if he slept longer
with his breast open in the cool of the morning air. On this he thanked
me with a sweetness perfectly agreeing with that of his features and
eyes; the last now broad open, and eagerly surveying me, carried the
surightly fires they sparkled with directly to my heart.

It seems, that having drank too freely before he came upon the rake with
some of his young companions, he had put himself out of a condition to
go through all the weapons with them, and crown the night with a getting
a mistress; so that seeing me in a loose undress, he did not doubt but I
was one of the misses of the house, sent in to repair his loss of time;
but though he seized that notion, and a very obvious one it was, without
hesitation, yet, whether my figure made a more than ordinary impression
on him, or whether it was his natural politeness, he addressed me in
a manner far from rude, though still on the foot of one of the house
pliers come to amuse him; and giving me the first kiss that I ever
relished from man in my life, asked me if I could favour him with my
company, assuring me that he would make it worth my while: but had
not even new-born love, that true refiner of lust, opposed so sudden a
surrender, the fear of being surprised by the house was a sufficient bar
to my compliance.

I told him then, in a tone set by love itself, that for reasons I had
not time to explain to him. I could not stay with him, and might even
ever see him again, with a sigh at these words, which broke from the
bottom of my heart. My conqueror, who, as he afterwards told me, had
been struck with my appearance, and liked me as much as he could think
of liking any one in my supposed way of life, asked me briskly at once,
if I would be kept by him, and that he would take a lodging for me
directly, and relieve me from any engagements he presumed I might be
under to the house.

Rash, sudden, undigested, even dangerous as this offer might be from a
perfect stranger, and that stranger a giddy boy, the prodigious love
I was struck with for him, had put a charm into every objection: I not
resisting, and blinded me to every objection; I could, at that instant,
have died for him: think if I could resist an invitation to live with
him! Thus my heart, beating strong to the proposal, dictated my answer,
after scarce a minute's pause, that I would accept of his offer, and
make my escape to him in what way he pleased, and that I would be
entirely at his disposal, let it be good or bad. I have often since
wondered that so great an easiness did not disgust him, or make me too
cheap in his eyes, but my fate had so appointed it, that in his fears of
the hazzard of the town, he had been some time looking out for a girl to
take into keeping, and my person happening to hit his fancy, it was by
one of those miracles reserved to love, that we struck the bargain in
the instant, which we sealed by an exchange of kisses, that the hopes of
a more uninterrupted enjoyment engaged him to content himself with.

Never, however, did dear youth carry in his head more wherewith
to justify the turning of a girl's head, and making her set all
consequences at defiance, for the sake of following a gallant.

For, besides all the perfections of manly beauty which were assembled in
his form, he had an air of neatness and gentility, certain smartness in
the carriage and port of his head, that yet more distinguished him; his
eyes were sprightly and full of meaning; his looks had in them something
at once sweet and commanding; his complexion out-bloomed the lovely
coloured rose, whilst its inimitable tender vivid glow clearly saved
it from the reproach of wanting life, of raw and dough-like, which is
commonly made of those so extremely fair as he was.

Our little plan was, that I should get out about seven the next morning
(which I could readily promise, as I knew where to get the key of the
street door) and he would wait at the end of the street with a coach
to convey me safe off; after which, we would send, and clear any debt
incurred by my stay at Mrs. Brown's, who, he only judged, in gross,
might not care to part with one, he thought, so fit to draw custom to
the house.

I then just hinted to him not to mention in the house his having seen
such a person as me, for reasons I would explain to him more at leisure.
And then, for fear of miscarrying, by being seen together, I tore myself
from him with a bleeding heart, and stole up softly to my room, where
I found Phoebe still fast asleep, and hurrying off my few clothes,
lay down by her, with a mixture of joy and anxiety, that may be easier
conceived than expressed.

The risks of Mrs. Brown's discovering my purpose, of disappointments,
misery, ruin, all vanished before this new-kindled flame. The seeing,
the touching, the being, if but for a night, with this idol of my
fond virgin heart, appeared to me a happiness above the purchase of my
liberty or life. He might use me ill, let him: he was the master, happy,
too happy, even to receive death at so dear a hand.

To this purpose were the reflections of the whole day, of which every
minute seemed to me a little eternity. How often did I visit the clock!
nay, was tempted to advance the tedious hand, as if that would have
advanced the time with it! Had those of the house had the least
observations on me, they must have remarked something extraordinary from
the discomposure I could not help betraying; especially when at dinner
mention was made of the charmingest youth having been there, and stayed
breakfast. "Oh! he was such a beauty!... I should have died for him!...
they would pull caps for him!..." and the like fooleries; which,
however, was throwing oil on a fire I was sorely put to it to smother
the blaze of.

The fluctuations of my mind, the whole day, produced one good effect:
which was, that, through mere fatigue, I slept tolerably well till five
in the morning, when I got up, and having dressed myself, waited, under
the double tortures of fear and impatience, for the appointed hour.
It came at last, the dear, critical, dangerous hour came; and now,
supported only by the courage love lent me, I ventured, a tip-toe, down
stairs, leaving my box behind, for fear of being surprized with it in
going out.

I got to the street door, the key whereof was always laid on the
chair by our bed side, in trust with Phoebe, who having not the least
suspicion of my entertaining any design to go from them (nor, indeed,
had I, but the day before), made no reserve or concealment of it from
me. I opened the door with great ease; love, that emboldened, protected
me too: and now, got safe into the street, I saw my new guardian angel
waiting at a coach door, ready open. How I got to him I know not: I
suppose I flew; but I was in the coach in a trice, and he by the side of
me, with his arms clasped round me, and giving me the kiss of welcome.
The coachman had his orders, and drove to them.

My eyes were instantly filled with tears, but tears of the most
delicious delight; to find myself in the arms of that beauteous youth,
was a rapture that my little hear swam in; past or future were equally
out of the question with me; the present was as much as all my powers
of life were sufficient to bear the transport of, without fainting. Nor
were the most tender embraces, the most soothing expressions wanting
on his side, to assure me of his love, and of never giving me cause to
repent the bold step I had taken, in throwing myself thus entirely upon
his honour and generosity. But, alas! this was no merit in me, for I was
drove to it by a passion too impetuous for me to resist, and, I did what
I did, because I could not help it.

In an instant, for time was now annihilated with me, we were landed at a
public house in Chelsea, hospitably commodious for the reception of duet
parties of pleasure, where a breakfast of chocolate was prepared for us.

An old jolly stager, who kept it, and understood life perfectly well,
breakfasted with us, and leering archly at me, gave us both joy, and
said, "we were well paired, i' faith! that a great many gentlemen and
ladies used his house, but he had never seen a handsomer couple... he
was sure I was a fresh piece... I looked so country, so innocent! well
my spouse was a lucky man!..." all which, common landlord's cant, not
only pleased and soothed me, but helped to diver my confusion at being
with my new sovereign, whom, the minute approached, I began to fear to
be alone with: a timidity which true love had a greater share in than
even maiden bashful-ness.

I wished, I doated, I could have died for him; and yet, I know not how,
or why I dreaded the point which had been the object of my fiercest
wishes; my pulses beat fears, amidst a flush of the warmest desires.
This struggle of the passions, however, this conflict betwixt modesty
and lovesick longings, made me burst again into tears; which he took, as
he had done before, only for the remains of concern and emotion at the
suddenness of my change of condition, in committing myself to his care;
and, in consequence of that idea, did and said all that he thought would
most comfort and re-inspirit me.

After breakfast, Charles (the dear familiar name I must take the liberty
henceforward to distinguish my Adonis by), with a smile full of meaning,
took me gently by the hand, and said: "Come, my dear, I will show you
a room that commands a fine prospect over some gardens"; and without
waiting for an answer, in which he relieved me extremely, he led me up
into a chamber, airy and lightsome, where all seeing of prospects was
out of the question, except that of a bed, which had all the air of
recommending the room to him.

Charles had just slipped the bolt of the door, and running, caught me in
his arms, and lifting me from the ground, with his lips glued to mine,
bore me trembling, panting, dying with soft fears and tender wishes, to
the bed; where his impatience would not suffer him to undress me, more
than just unpinning my handkerchief and gowns, and unlacing my stays.

My bosom was now bare, and rising in the warmest throbs, presented to
his sight and feeling the firm hard swell of a pair of young breast,
such as may be imagined of a girl not sixteen, fresh out of the country,
and never before handled: but even their pride, whiteness, fashion,
pleasing resistance to the touch, could not bribe his restless hands
from roving; but, giving them the loose, my petticoats and shift were
soon taken up, and their stronger center of attraction laid open to
their tender invasion. My fears, however, made me mechanically close
my thighs; but the very touch of his hand insinuated between them,
disclosed them and opened a way for the main attack.

In the mean time, I lay fairly exposed to the examination of his eyes
and hands, quiet and unresisting; which confirmed him the opinion he
proceeded so cavalierly upon, that I was no novice in these matters,
since he had taken me out of a common bawdy house, nor had I said one
thing to prepossess him of my virginity; and if I had, he would sooner
have believed that I took him for a cully that would swallow such an
improbability, than that I was still mistress of that darling treasure,
that hidden mine, so eagerly sought after by the men, and which they
never dig for, but to destroy.

Being now too high wound up to bear a delay, he unbuttoned, and drawing
out the engine of love assaults, drove it currently, as at a ready
made breach... Then! then! for the first time, did I feel that stiff
horn-hard gristle, battering against the tender part; but imagine to
yourself his surprise, when he found, after several vigorous pushes,
which hurt me extremely, that he made not the least impression.

I complained, but tenderly complained: "I could not bear it... indeed
he hurt me!..." Still he thought no more, than that being so young, the
largeness of his machine (for few men could dispute size with him) made
all the difficulty; and that possibly I had not been enjoyed by any so
advantageously made in that part as himself: for still, that my virgin
flower was yet un-cropped, never entered into his head, and he would
have thought it idling with time and words, to have questioned me upon
it.

He tried again, still no admittance, still no penetration; but he had
hurt me yet more, while my extreme love made me bear extreme pain,
almost without a groan. At length, after repeated fruitless trials, he
lay down panting by me, kissed my falling tears, and asked me tenderly
"what was the meaning of so much complaining? and if I had not borne it
better from other than I did from him?" I answered, with a simplicity
framed to persuade, that he was the first mam that ever served me so.
Truth is powerful, and it is not always that we do not believe what we
eagerly wish.

Charles, already disposed by the evidence, of his senses to think my
pretences to virginity not entirely apocryphal, smothers me with kisses,
begs me, in the-name of love, to have a little patience, and that he
wilt be as tender of hurting me as he would be of himself..

Alas! it was enough I knew his pleasure to submit joyfully to him,
whatever pain I foresaw it would cost, me.

He now resumes his attempts in more form: first, he put one of the
pillows under me, to give the blank of his aim a more favourable
elevation, and another Under my head, in ease of it; then spreading my
thighs, and placing himself standing betwen them, made them rest upon
his; applying then the point of his machine to the slit, into which he
sought entrance, it was so small, he could scarce assure himself of its
being rightly pointed. He looks, he feels, and satisfies himself:
there driving on with fury, its prodigious stiffness, thus impacted,
wedgelike, breaks the union of those parts, and gained him just the
insertion of the tip of it, lip deep; which being sensible of, he
improved his advantage, and following well his stroke, in a straight
line, forcibly deepens his penetration; but put me to such intolerable
pain, from the separation of the sides of that soft passage by a hard
thick body, I could have screamed out; but, as I was unwilling to alarm
the house, I held in my breath, and crammed my petticoat, which was;
turned up over my face, into my mouth, and bit it through in the agony.
At length, the tender texture of that tract giving way to such fierce
tearing and rending, he pierced something further into me: and now,
outrageous and no longer his own master, but borne headlong away by the
fury and over-mettle of that member, now exerting itself with a kind
of native rage, he breaks in, carries all before him, and one violent
merciless lunge, sent it, imbrued, and reeking with virgin blood, up
to the very hilt in me... Then! then all my resolution deserted me: I
screamed out, and fainted away with the sharpness of the pain; and, as
he told me afterwards, on his drawing out, when emission was over with
him, my thighs were instantly all in a stream of blood, that flowed from
the wounded torn passage.

When I recovered my senses, I found myself undressed and a-bed, in the
arms of the sweet relenting murderer of my virginity, who hung mourning
tenderly over me, and holding in his hand a cordial, which, coming from
the still dear author of so much pain, I could not refuse; my eyes,
however, moistened with tears, and languishingly turned upon him, seemed
to reproach him with his cruelty, and ask him, if such were the rewards
of love. But Charles, to whom I was now infinitely endeared by his
complete triumph over a maidenhead, where he so little expected to find
one, in tenderness to that pain which he had put me to, in procuring
himself the height of pleasure, smothered his exultation, and employed
himself with so much sweetness, so much warmth, to sooth, to caress, and
comfort me in my soft complainings, which breathed, indeed, more love
than resentment, that I presently drowned all sense of pain in the
pleasure of seeing him, of thinking that I belonged to him: he who was
now the absolute disposer of my happiness, and, in one word, my fate.

The sore was, however, too tender, the wound too bleeding fresh, for
Charles's good-nature to put my patience presently to another trial; but
as I could not stir, or walk a-cross the room, he ordered the dinner
to be brought to the bed side, where it could not be otherwise than my
getting down the wing of a fowl, and two or three glasses of wine, since
it was my adored youth who both served, and urged them on me, with that
sweet irresistible authority with which love had invested him over me.

After dinner, and everything but the wine was taken away, Charles very
impudently asks a leave, he might read the grant of in my eyes, to come
to bed to me, and accordingly falls to undressing; which I could not see
the progress of without strange emotions of fear and pleasure.

He is now in bed with me the first time, and in broad day; but when
thrusting up his own shirt and my shift, he laid his naked glowing body
to mine... oh insupportable delight! oh! superhuman rapture! what pain
could stand before a pleasure so transporting? I felt no more the smart
of my wounds below; but, curling round him like the tendril of a vine,
as if I feared any part of him should be untouched or unpressed by me, I
returned his strenuous embraces and kisses with a fervour and gust only
known to true love, and which mere lust never rise to.

Yes, even at this time, that all the tyranny of the passions is fully
over, and that my veins roll no longer but a cold tranquil stream, the
remembrance of those passages that most affected me in my youth, still
cheers and refreshes me; let me proceed then. My beauteous youth was now
glued to me in all the folds and twists that we could make our bodies
meet in; when, no longer able to rein in the fierceness of refreshed
desires, he gives his steed the head, and gently insinuating his thighs
between mine, stopping my mouth with kisses of humid fire, makes a fresh
eruption, and renewing his thrusts, pierces, tears, and forces his way
up the torn tender folds, that yielded him admission with a smart little
less severe that when the breach was first made I stifled, however, my
cries, and bore him with the passive fortitude of an heroine; soon his
thrusts, more and more furious, cheeks flushed with a deeper scarlet,
his eyes turned up in the fervent fit, some dying sighs, and an
agonizing shudder, announced the approaches of that extatic pleasure, I
was yet in too much pain to come in for my share of.

Nor was it till after a few enjoyments had numbed and blunted the
sense of the smart, and given me to feel the titillating inspersion of
balsamic sweets, drew from me the delicious return, and brought down all
my passion, that I arrived at excess of pleasure through excess of pain.
But, when successive engagements had broke and inured me, I began to
enter into the true unalloyed relish of that pleasure of pleasures, when
the warm gush darts through all the ravished inwards; what floods of
bliss! what melting transports! what agonies of delight! too fierce,
too mighty for nature to sustain?... well has she therefore, no doubt
provided the relief of a delicious momentary dissolution, the approaches
of which are intimated by a dear delirium, a sweet thrill, on the point
of emitting those liquid sweets, in which enjoyment itself is drowned,
when one gives the languishing stretch out, and die at the discharge.

How often, when the rage and tumult of my senses had subsided, after
the melting flow, have I, in a tender meditation, asked myself cooly the
question, if it was in nature for any of its creatures to be so happy as
I was? Or, what were all fears of the consequence, put in the scale of
one night's enjoyment, of any thing so transcendently the taste of my
eyes and heart, as that delicious, fond, matchless youth.

Thus we spent the whole afternoon, till supper time in a continued
circle of love delights, kissing, turtle-billing, toying, and all the
rest of the feast. At length, supper was served in, before which Charles
had, for I do not know what reason, slipped his clothes on; and sitting
down by the bed side, we made table and tablecloth of the bed and
sheets, whilst he suffered nobody to attend or serve but himself. He
ate with a very good appetite, and seemed charmed to see me eat. For
my part, I was so transported with the comparison of the delights I
now swam in, with the insipidity of all my past scenes of life, that I
thought them sufficiently cheap, at even the price of my ruin, or the
risk of their not lasting. The present possession was all my little head
could find room for.

We lay together that night, when, after playing repeated prizes of
pleasure, nature, overspent and satisfied, gave us up to the arms of
sleep: those of my dear youth encircled me, the consciousness of which
made even that sleep more delicious.

Late in the morning I waked, first; and observing my lover slept
profoundly, softly disengaged myself from his arms, scarcely daring to
breathe, for fear of shortening his repose; my cap, my hair, my shift,
were all in disorder, from the rufflings I had undergone; and I took
this opportunity to adjust and set them as well as I could: whilst,
every now and then, looking at the sleeping youth, with inconceivable
fondness and delight, and reflecting on all the pain he had put me to,
tacitly owned that the pleasure had overpaid me for my sufferings.

It was then broad day. I was sitting up in the bed, the clothes of
which were all tossed, or rolled off, by the unquietness of our motions,
from the sultry heat of the weather; nor could I refuse myself a
pleasure that solicited me so irresistibly, as this fair occasion of
feasting my sight with all those treasures of youthful beauty I had
enjoyed, and which lay now almost entirely naked, his shirt being
trussed up in a perfect wisp, which the warmth of the season and room
made me easy about the consequence of. I hung over him enamoured indeed!
and devoured all his naked charms with only two eyes, when I could have
wished them at least an hundred for the fuller enjoyment of the gaze.

Oh! could I paint his figure as I see it now, still present to my
transported imagination! a whole length of an all perfect manly beauty
in full view. Think of a face without a fault, glowing with all the
opening bloom and verdant freshness of an age, in which beauty is of
either sex, and which the first down over his upper lip scarce began to
distinguish.

The parting of the double ruby pout of his lips seemed to exhale an air
sweeter and purer than what it drew in: ah! what violence did it not
cost me to refrain the so tempted kiss!

Then a neck exquisitely turned, graved behind and on the sides with fais
hair, playing freely in natural ringlets, connected his head to a body
of the most perfect form, and of the most vigorous contexture, in which
all the strength of manhood was concealed, and softened to appearance
by the delicacy of his complexion, the smoothness of his skin, and the
plumpness of his flesh.

The platform of his snow white bosom, that was laid out in a manly
proportion, presented, on the vermilion summit of each pap, the idea of
a rose about to blow.

Nor did his shirt hinder me from observing the symmetry of his limbs,
that exactness of shape, in the fall of it towards the loins, where the
waist ends and the rounding swell of the hips commences; where the skin,
sleek, smooth, and dazzling white, burnishes on; the stretch-over firm,
plump, ripe flesh, that crimped' and ran into dimples at the least
pressure, or that the touch could not rest upon, but slid over on the
surface of the most polished ivory.

His thighs, finely fashioned, and with a florid glossy roundness,
gradually tapering away to the knees, seemed pillars worthy to support
that beauteous frame at the bottom of which I could not, without
some remains of terror, some tender emotions too, fix my eyes on that
terrible machine, which had, not long before, with such fury broke into,
torn, and almost ruined those soft, tender parts of mine, that had not
yet done smarting with the effects of its rage; but behold it now! crest
fallen, reclining its half-caped vermilion head over one of his thighs,
quiet, pliant, and to all appearances incapable of the mischiefs and
cruelty it had committed. Then the beautiful growth of the hair, in
short and soft curls round its roots, its whiteness, branched veins, the
supple softness of the shaft, as it lay foreshortened, rolled and
shrunk up into a squat thickness, languid, and borne up from between
his thighs, by its globular appendage, that wondrous treasure bag
of nature's sweets, which revelled round, and pursed up in the
only wrinkles that are known to please, perfected the prospect, and
altogether formed the most interesting moving picture in nature, and
surely infinitely superior to those nudities furnished by the painters,
statuaries, or any art, which are purchased at immense prices; whilst
the sight of them in actual life is scarce sovereignly tasted by any
but the few whom nature has endowed with a fire of imagination, warmly
pointed by a truth of judgment to the spring-head, the originals of
beauty, of nature's unequalled composition, above all the imitations of
art, or the reach of wealth to pay their price.

But every thing must have an end. A motion made by this angelic youth,
in the listlessness of goingoff sleep, replaced his shirt and the bed
clothes in a posture that shut up that treasury from longer view.

I lay down then, and carrying my hands to that part of me in which the
objects just seen had begun to raise a mutiny, that prevailed over the
smart of them, my fingers now opened themselves an easy passage; but
long I had not time to consider the wide difference there, between
the maid and the now finished woman, before Charles waked, and turning
towards me, kindly enquired how I had rested? and, scarce giving me time
to answer, imprinted on my lips one of his burning rapture kisses, which
darted a flame to my heart, that from thence radiated to every part of
me; and presently, as if he had proudly meant revenge for the survey I
had smuggled of all his naked beauties, he spurns off the bed clothes,
and trussing up my shift as high as it would go, took his turn to feast
his eyes on all the gifts nature had bestowed on my person; his busy
hands, too, ranged intemperately over every part of me. The delicious
austerity and hardness of my yet unripe budding breasts, the whiteness
and firmness of my flesh, the freshness and regularity of my features,
the harmony of my limbs, all seemed to confirm him in his satisfaction
with his bargain; but when curious to explore the havock he had made
in the centre of his over fierce attack, he not only directed his hands
there, but with a pillow put under, placed me favourably for his
wanton purpose of inspection. Then, who can express the fire his eyes
glistened, his hands glowed with! whilst sighs of pleasure, and tender
broken exclamations, were all the praises he could utter. By this time
his machine, stiffly risen at me, gave me to see it in its highest state
and bravery. He feels it himself, seems pleased at its condition, and,
smiling loves and graces, seizes one of my hands, and carries it, with
gentle compulsion, to this pride of nature, and its richest master
piece.

I, struggling faintly, could not help feeling what I could not grasp, a
column of the whitest ivory, beautifully streaked with blue veins, and
carrying, fully un-capt, a head of the liveliest vermilion: no horn
could be harder or stiffer; yet no velvet more smooth or delicious to
the touch. Presently he guided my hand lower, to that part in which
nature, and pleasure keep their stores in concert, so aptly fastened
and hung on to the root of their first instrument and minister, that not
improperly he might be styled their purse-bearer too: there he made
me feel distinctly, through their soft cover, the contents, a pair of
roundish balls, that seemed to play within, and elude all pressure, but
the tenderest, from without.

But now this visit of my soft, warm hand, in those so sensible parts,
had put every thing into such ungovernable fury, disdaining all further
preluding, and taking advantage of my commodious posture, he made the
storm fall where I scarce patiently expected, and where he was sure
to lay it: presently, then, I felt the stiff intersection betwen the
yielding, divided lips of the wound, now open for life; where the
narrowness no longer put me to intolerable pain, and afforded my lover
no more difficulty than what heightened his pleasure, in the strict
embrace of that tender, warm sheath, round the instrument it was so
delicately adjusted to, and which now cased home, so gorged me with
pleasure, that it perfectly suffocated me and took away my breath; then
the killing thrusts! the unnumbered kisses! every one of which was a joy
inexpressible; and that joy lost in a crowd of yet greater blisses! But
this was a disorder too violent in nature to last long: the vessels, so
stirred and intensely heated, soon boiled over, and for that time
put out the fire; meanwhile all this dalliance and disport had so
far consumed the morning, that it became a kind of necessity to lay
breakfast and dinner into one.

In our calmer intervals Charles gave the following account of himself,
every tittle of which was true. He was the only son of a father, who,
having a small post in the revenue, rather overlived his income, and had
given this young gentleman a very slender education: no profession
had he bred him up to, but designed to provide for him in the army, by
purchasing him an ensign's commission, that is to say, provided he could
raise the money, or procure it by interest, either of which clauses was
rather to be wished than hoped for by him. On no better a plan, however,
had his improvident father suffered this youth, a youth of great
promise, to run up to the age of manhood, or near it at least, in next
to idleness; and had, besides, taken no sort of pains to give him even
the common premonitions against the vices of the town, and the dangers
of all sorts which wait the unexperienced and unwary in it. He lived at
home, and at discretion with his father, who himself kept a mistress;
and for the rest, provided Charles did not ask him for money, he was
indolently kind to him: he might lie out when he pleased, any excuse
would serve, and even his reprimands were so slight, that they carried
with them rather an air of connivance at the fault, than any serious
control or constraint. But, to supply his calls for money, Charles,
whose mother was dead, had, by her side, a grandmother, who doated
upon him. She had a considerable annuity to live on, and very regularly
parted with every shilling she could spare, to this darling of her's, to
the no little heart-burn of his father; who was vexed, not that she, by
this means, fed his son's extravagance, but that she preferred Charles
to himself; and we shall too soon see what a fatal turn such a mercenary
jealousy could operate on the breast of a father.

Charles was, however, by the means of his grandmother's lavish fondness,
very sufficiently enabled to keep a mistress, so easily contented as my
love made me; and my good fortune, for such I must ever call it, threw
me in his way, in the manner above related, just as he was on the
look-out for one.

As to temper, the even sweetness of it made him seem born for domestic
happiness: tender, naturally polite, and gentle-manner'd; it could never
be his fault, if ever jars, or animosities ruffled a calm he was so
qualified every way to maintain or restore. Without those great or
shining qualities that constitute a genius, or are fit to make a noise
in the world, he had all those humble ones that compose the softer
social merit: plain common sense, set off with every grace of modesty
and good nature, made him, if not admired, what is much happier:
universally beloved and esteemed. But, as nothing but the beauties
of his person had at first attracted my regard and fixed my passion,
neither was I then a judge of the internal merit, which I had afterwards
full occasion to discover, and which, perhaps, in that season of
giddiness and levity, would have touched my heart very little, had it
been lodged in a person less the delight of my eyes, and idol of my
senses. But to return to our situation.

After dinner, which we ate a-bed in most voluptuous disorder, Charles
got up, and taking a passionate leave of me for a few hours, went to
town, where concerting matters with a young sharp lawyer, they went
together to my late venerable mistress's, from whence I had, but the
day before, made my elopement, and with whom he was determined to settle
accounts, in a manner that should cut off all after reckonings from that
quarter.

Accordingly they went; but by the way, the Templar, his friend, on
thinking over Charles's information, saw reason to give their visit
another turn, and, instead of offering satisfaction, to demand it.

On being let in, the girls of the house flocked round Charles, whom they
knew, and from the earlyness of my escape, and their perfect ignorance
of his ever having so much as seen me, not having the least suspicion of
his being accessory to my flight, they were, in their way, making up to
him; and as to his companion, they took him probably for a fresh cully.
But the Templar soon checked their forwardness, by enquiring for the old
lady, with whom he said, with a grave-like countenance, that he had some
business to settle.

Madam was immediately sent for down, and the ladies being desired to
clear the room, the lawyer asked her, severely, if she did know, or had
not decoyed, under pretence of hiring as a servant, a young girl, just
come out of the country, called Frances or Fanny Hill, describing me
withal as particularly as he could from Charlie's description.

It is peculiar to vice to tremble at the enquiries of justice; and
Mrs. Brown, whose conscience was not entirely clear upon my account,
as knowing as she was of the town as hackneyed as she was in bluffing
through all the dangers of her vocation, could not help being alarmed at
the questions, especially when he went on to talk of a Justice of peace,
Newgate, the Old Bailey, indictments for keeping a disorderly house,
pillory, carting, and the whole process of that nature. She, who, it is
likely, imagined I had lodged an information against her house, looked
extremely blank, and began to make a thousand protestations and excuses.
However, to abridge, they brought away triumphantly my box of things,
which, had she not ben under an awe, she might have disputed with them;
and not only that, but a clearance and discharge of any demands on the
house, at the expense of no more than a bowl of arrack-punch, the
treat of which, together with the choice of the house conveniences,
was offered and not accepted. Charles all the time acted the chance
companion of the lawyer, who had brought him there, as he knew the
house, and appeared in no wise interested in the issue; but he had the
collateral pleasure of hearing all that I told him verified, as far as
the bawd's fears would give her leave to enter into my history, which,
if one may guess by the composition she so readily came into, were not
small.

Phoebe, my kind tutoress Phoebe, was at the time gone out, perhaps in
search of me, or their cooked-up story had not, it is probable, passed
smoothly.

This negociation had, however, taken up some time, which would have
appeared much longer to me, left as I was, in a strange house, if the
landlady, a motherly sort of a woman, to whom Charles had liberally
recommended me, had not come up and borne me company. We drank tea, and
her chat helped to pass away the time very agreeably, since he was our
theme; but as the evening deepened, and the hour set for his return was
elapsed, I could not dispel the gloom of impatience, and tender fears
which gathered upon me, and which our timid sex are apt to feel in
proportion to their love.

Long, however, I did not suffer: the sight of him over-paid me; and the
soft reproach I had prepared for him, expired before it reached my lips.

I was still a-bed, yet unable to use my legs otherwise than awkwardly,
and Charles flew to me, catches me in his arms, raised and extending
mine to meet his dear embrace, and gives me an account, interrupted by
many a sweet parenthesis of kisses, of the success of his measures.

I could not help laughing at the fright of the old woman had been put
into, which my ignorance, and indeed my want of innocence, had far from
prepared me from bespeaking. She had, it seems, apprehended that I fled
the shelter to some relation I had recollected in town, on my dislike
of their ways and proceedings towards me, and that this application came
from thence; for, as Charles had rightly judged, not one neighbour had,
at that still hour, seen the circumstance of my escape into the coach,
or, at least, noticed him; neither had any in the house, the least hint
of suspicion of my having spoken to him, much less of my having clapt
up such a sudden bargain with a perfect stranger, thus the greatest
improbability is not always what we should most mistrust.

We supped with all the gaiety of two young giddy creatures at the top of
their desires; and as I had given up to Charles the whole charge of my
future happiness, I thought of nothing beyond the exquisite pleasure of
possessing him.

He came to bed in due time; and this second night, the pain being pretty
well over, I tasted, in full draught, all the transports of perfect
enjoyment: I swam, I bathed in bliss, till both fell asleep, through the
natural consequences of satisfied desires, and appeased flames; nor did
we wake but to renewed raptures.

Thus, making the most of love, and life did we stay in this lodging
in Chelsea about ten days; in which time Charles took care to give his
excursions from home a favourable gloss, and to keep his footing
with his fond indulgent grand-mother, from whom he drew constant and
sufficient supplies for the charge I was to him, and which was very
trifling, in comparison with his former less regular course of pleasure.

Charles removed me then to a private ready furnished lodging in D....
street, St. James's, where he paid half a guinea a week for two rooms
and a closet on the second floor, which he had been some time looking
out for, and was more convenient for the frequency of his visits, than
where he had at first placed me, in a house, which I cannot say but
I left with regret, as it was infinitely endeared to me by the first
possession of my Charles, and the circumstance of losing, there, that
jewel, which can never be twice lost. The landlord, however, had no
reason to complain of any thing, but of a procedure in Charles too
liberal not to make him regret the loss of us.

Arrived at our new lodging, I remember I thought them extremely fine,
though ordinary enough, even at that price; but, had it been a dungeon
that Charles had brought me to, his presence would have made a little
Versailles.

The landlady, Mrs. Jones, waited on us to our apartment, and with great
volubility of tongue, explained to us all its conveniences: "that her
own maid should wait on us... that the best of quality had lodged at
her house... that her first floor was let to a foreign secretary of an
embassy, and his lady... that I looked like a very good natured lady..."
At the word lady, I blushed out of flattered vanity: this was strong
for a girl of my condition; for though Charles had the precaution of
dressing me in a less tawdry flaunting style than were the clothes I
escaped to him in, and of passing me for his wife, that she had secretly
married, and kept private (the old story) on account of his friends, I
dare swear this appeared extremely apocryphal to a woman who knew the
town so well as she did; but that was the least of her concern: it was
impossible to be less scruple-ridden than she was; and the advantage of
letting her rooms being her sole object, the truth itself would have far
from scandalized her, or broke her bargain.

A sketch of her picture, and personal history, will dispose you to
account for the part she is to act in my concern.

She was about forty six years old, tall, meagre, red-haired, with one
of those trivial ordinary faces you meet with every where, and go
about unheeded and un-mentioned. In her youth she had been kept by a
gentleman, who, dying, left her forty pounds a year during her life, in
consideration of a daughter he had by her: which daughter, at the age
of seventeen, she sold, for not a very considerable sum neither, to a
gentleman who was going on envoy abroad, and took his purchase with him,
where he used her with the utmost tenderness, and it is thought, was
secretly married to her: but had constantly made a point of her not
keeping up the least correspondence with a mother base enough to make a
market of her own flesh and blood. However, as she had not nature,
nor, indeed, any passion but that of money, this gave her no further
uneasiness, then, as she thereby lost a handle of squeezing pres-sents,
or other after-advantages, out of the bargain. Indifferent then, by
nature of constitution, to every other pleasure but that of increasing
the lump, by any means whatever, she commenced a kind of private
procuress, for which she was not amiss fitted, by her grave decent
appearance, and sometimes did a job in the match-making way; in short,
there was, nothing that appeared to her under the shape of gain, that
she would not have undertaken. She knew most of the ways of the town,
having not only herself been upon, but kept up constant intelligences in
promoting a harmony between the two sexes, in private pawn-broking, and
other profitable secrets. She rented the house she lived in, and made
the most of it, by letting it out in lodgings; though she was worth, at
least, near three or four thousand pounds, she would not allow herself
even the necessaries, of life, and pinned her subsistence entirely on
what she could squeeze out of her lodgers.

When she saw such a young pair come under her roof, her immediate
notions, doubtless, were how she should make the most money of us, by
every means that money might be made, and which, she rightly judged, our
situations and inexperience would soon beget her occasions of.

In this hopeful sanctuary, and under the clutches of this harpy, did
we pitch our residence. It will not be might material to you, or very
pleasant to me, to enter into a detail of all the petty cut-throat ways
and means with which she used to fleece us; all which Charles indolently
chose to bear with, rather than take the trouble of removing, the
difference of expense being scarce attended to by a young gentleman who
had no ideas of stint, or even economy, and a raw country girl who knew
nothing of the matter.

Here, however, under the wings of my sovereignly beloved, did the most
delicious hours of my life flow on; my Charles I had, and, in him,
every thing my fond heart could wish or desire. He carried me to plays,
operas, masquerades, and every diversion of the town; all which pleased
me, indeed, but pleased me infinitely the more for his being with me,
and explaining every thing to me, and enjoying perhaps, the natural
impressions of surprise and admiration, which such sights, at the first,
never fail to excite in a country girl, new to the delights of them; but
to me, they sensibly proved the power and dominion of the sole passion
of my heart over me, a passion in which soul and body were concentered,
and left me no room for any other relish of life but love.

As to the men I saw at those places, or at any other, they suffered so
much in the comparison my eyes made of them with my all-perfect Adonis,
that I had not the infidelity even of one wandering thought to reproach
myself with upon his account. He was the universe to me, and all that
was not him, was nothing to me.

My love, in fine, was so excessive, that is arrived at annihilating
every suggestion or kindling spark of jealousy; for, one idea only,
tending that way, gave me such exquisite torment, that my self-love, and
dread of worse than death, made me for ever renounce and defy it: nor
had I, indeed, occasion; for, were I to enter here on the recital of
several instances wherein Charles sacrificed to me women of much greater
importance than I dare hint (which, considering his form, was no such
wonder), I might, indeed, give you full proof of his unshaken constancy
to me; but would not you accuse me of warming up against a feast, which
my vanity ought long ago to have been satisfied with?

In our cessations from active pleasure, Charles framed himself one, in
instructing me, as far as his own lights reached, in a great many
points of life, that I was, in consequence of my no-education, perfectly
ignorant of: nor did I suffer one word to fall in vain from the mouth of
my lovely teacher: I hung on every syllable he uttered, and received,
as oracles, all he said; whilst kisses were all the interruption I could
not refuse myself the pleasure of admitting, from lips that breathed
more than Arabian sweetness, I was in a little time enabled, by the
progress I had made, to prove the deep regard I had paid to all that he
had said to me: repeating it to him almost word for word; and to shew
that I was not entirely the parrot, but that I reflected upon, that I
entered into it, I joined my own comments, and asked him questions of
explanation.

My country accent, and the rusticity of my gait, manners, and
deportment, began now sensibly to wear off: so quick was my observation,
and so efficacious my desire of growing every day worthier of his heart.

As to money, though, he brought me constantly all he received, it was
with difficulty he even got me to give it room in my bureau; and what
clothes I had, he could prevail on me to accept of on no other foot,
than that of pleasing him by the greater neatness in my dress, beyond
which I had no ambition. I could have made a pleasure of the greatest
toil, and worked my fingers to the bone, with joy, to have supported
him: guess, then, if I could harbour any idea of being burthensome to
him, and this disinterested turn in me was so unaffected, so much the
dictate of my heart, that Charles could not but feel it: and if he did
not love me as much as I did him (which was the constant and only matter
of sweet contention between us), he managed so, at least, as to give me
the satisfaction of believing it impossible for man to be more tender,
more true, more faithful than he was.

Our landlady, Mrs. Jones, came frequently up to my apartment, from
whence I never stirred on any pretext without Charles; nor was it
long before she wormed out, without much art, the secret of our having
cheated the church of a ceremony, and, in course, of the terms we lived
together upon; a circumstance which far from displeased her, considering
the designs she had upon me, and which, alas! she will have too soon,
room to carry into execution. But in the meantime, her own experience
of life let her see, that any attempt, however indirect or disguised,
to divert or break, at least presently, so strong a cement of hearts
as ours was, could only end in losing two lodgers, of whom she had made
very competent advantages, if either of us came to smoke her commission,
for a commission she had from one of her customers, either to debauch,
or get me away from my keeper at any rate.

But the barbarity of my fate soon saved her the task of disuniting us.
I had now been eleven months with this life of my life, which had passed
in one continued rapid stream of delight: but nothing so violent was
ever made to last. I was about three months gone with a child by him,
a circumstances would have added to his tenderness, had he ever left
me room to believe it could receive an addition, when the mortal, the
unexpected blow of separation fell upon us. I shall gallop post-over
the particulars, which I shudder yet to think of, and cannot; to this
instant, reconcile myself how, or by what means I could out-live it.

Two live-long days had I lingered through without hearing from him, I
who breathed, who existed but in him, and had never yet seen twenty-four
hours pass without seeing or hearing from him. The third day my
impatience was so strong, my alarms had been so severe, that I perfectly
sickened with them; and being unable to support the shock longer, I sunk
upon the bed, and ringing for Mrs. Jones, who had far from comforted
me under my anxieties, she came up, and I had scarce breath and spirit
enough to find words to beg of her, if she would save my life, to fall
upon some means of finding out, instantly, what was become of its
only prop and comfort. She pitied me in a way that rather sharpened my
affliction than suspended it, and went out upon this commission.

For she had but to go to Charles's house, who lived but an easy
distance, in one of the streets that run into Covent Garden. There she
went into a public house, and from thence sent for a mid servant, whose
name I had given her, as the properest to inform her.

The maid readily came, and as readily, when Mrs. Jones enquired of her
what had become of Mr. Charles, or whether he was gone out of town,
acquainted her with the disposal of her master's son, which, the very
day after, was no secret to the servants. Such sure measures had he
taken, for the most cruel punishment of his child for having more
interest with his grandmother than he had, though he made use of a
pretence, plausible enough, to get rid of him in this secret abrupt
manner, for fear her fondness should have interposed a bar to his
leaving England, and proceeding on a voyage he had concerted for him;
which pretext was, that it was indispensably necessary to secure a
considerable inheritance that devolved to him by the death of a rich
merchant (his own brother) at one of the factories in the South Seas, of
which he had lately received advice, together with a copy of the will.

In consequence of which resolution, to send away his son, he had,
unknown to him, made the necessary preparations for fitting him out,
struck a bargain with the captain of a ship, whose punctual execution of
his orders he had secured, by his interest with his principal owners
and patron; and, in short, concerted his measures so secretly, and
effectually, that whilst the son thought he was going down to the
river, that would take him a few hours, he was stopt on board of a ship,
debarred from writing, and more strictly watched than a State criminal.

Thus was the idol of my soul torn from me, and forced on a long voyage,
without taking leave of one friend, or receiving one line of comfort,
except a dry explanation and instructions, from his father, how to
proceed when he should arrive at his destined port, enclosing, withal,
some letters of recommendation to a factor there: all these particulars
I did not learn minutely till some time after.

The maid, at the same time, added, that she was sure this usage of her
sweet young master would be the death of his grand-mamma, as indeed it
proved true; for the old lady, on hearing it, did not survive the news
a whole month, and as her fortune consisted in an annuity, out of which
she had laid up no reserves, she left nothing worth mentioning to her so
fatally envied darling, but absolutely refused to see his father before
she died.

When Mrs. Jones returned, and I observed her looks, they seemed so
unconcerned, and even nearest to pleased, that I half flattered myself
she was going to set my tortured heart at ease, by bringing me good
news; but this, indeed, was a cruel delusion of hope: the barbarian,
with all the coolness imaginable, stabs me to the heart, in telling
me, succinctly, that he was sent away, at least, on a four years' voyage
(here she stretched maliciously), and that I could not expect,
in reason, ever to see him again: and all this with such pregnant
circumstances, that I could not escape giving them credit, as they were,
indeed, too true!

She had hardly finished her report before I fainted away, and after
several successive fits, all the while wild and senseless, I miscarried
of the dear pledge of my Charles's love; but the wretched never die when
it is fittest they should die, and women are hard-lived! to a proverb.

The cruel and interested care taken to recover me, saved an odious life:
which, instead of the happiness and joys it had overflower in, all of
a sudden presented no view before me of any thing but the depth of
misery, horror, and the sharpest affliction.

Thus I lay six weeks, in the struggles of youth and constitution,
against the friendly efforts of death, which I constantly invoked to
my relief and deliverance, but which proved too weak for my wish. I
recovered at length, but into a state of stupefaction and despair, that
threatened me with the loss of my senses, and a mad house.

Time, however, that great comforter in ordinary, began to assuage the
violence of my suffering, and to-numb my feeling of them. My health
returned to me, though I still retained an air of grief, dejection, and
languor, which taking off from the ruddiness of my country complexion,
rendered it rather more delicate and affecting.

The landlady had all this while officiously provided, and seen that I
wanted for nothing: and as soon as she saw me retrieved into a condition
of answering her purpose, one day, after we had dined together, she
congratulated me on my recovery, the merit of which she took entirely
to herself, and all this by way of introduction to a most terrible, and
scurvy epilogue: "You are now," says she, "Miss Fanny, tolerably well,
and you are very welcome to stay in these lodgings as; long as you
please! you see I have asked you for nothing this long time, but truly
I have a call to make up a sum of money, which must be answered."
And, with that, presents me with a bill of arrears for rent, diet,
apothecaries' charges, nurse, etc., sum total twenty-three pounds,
seventeen and six-pence: towards discharging of which I had not in the
world (which she well knew) more than seven guineas, left by chance, of
my dear Charles's common stock, with me. At the same time, she desired
me to tell her what course I would take for payment. I burst out into
a flood of tears, and told her my condition: that I would sell what
few clothes I had, and that, for the rest, would pay her as soon as
possible. But my distress, being favourable to her view, only stiffened
her the more.

She told me, very cooly, that "she was indeed sorry for my misfortunes,
but that she must do herself justice, though it would go to the very
heart of her to send such a tender young creature to prison...." At the
word "prison!" every drop of my blood chilled, and my fright acted so
strongly upon me, that, turning as pale and faint as a criminal at the
first sight of his place of execution, I was on the point of swooning.
My landlady, who wanted only to terrify me to a certain point, and not
to throw me into a state of body inconsistent with her designs upon it,
began to sooth me again, and told me, in a tone composed to more pity
and gentleness, that "it would be my own fault, if she was forced to
proceed to such extremities; but she believed there was a friend to be
found in the world, who would make up matters to both our satisfactions,
and that she would bring him to drink tea with us that very afternoon,
when she hoped we would come to a right understanding in our affairs."
To all this, not a word of answer; I sat mute, confounded, terrified.

Mrs. Jones, however, judging rightly that it was time to strike while
the impressions were so strong upon me, left me to myself and to all
the terrors of an imagination, wounded to death by the idea of going to
prison, and, from a principle of self-preservation, snatching at every
glimpse of redemption from it.

In this situation I sat near half an hour, swallowed up in grief and
despair, when my landlady came in, and observing a death-like dejection
in my countenance, still in pursuance of her plan, put on a false pity,
and bidding me be of good heart: "Things," she said, "would be but
my own friend"; and closed with telling me "she had brought a very
honourable gentleman to drink tea with me, who would give me the best
advice how to get rid of all my troubles." Upon which, without waiting
for a reply, she goes out, and returns with this very honourable
gentleman, whose very honourable procuress she had been, on this, as
well as other occasions.

The gentleman, on his entering the room, made me a very civil bow, which
I had scarce strength, or presence of mind enough to return a curtsey
to; when the landlady, taking upon her to do all the honours of the
first interview (for I had never, that I remember, seen the gentleman
before), sets a chair for him, another for herself. All this while not a
word on either side; a stupid stare was all the face I could put on this
strange visit.

The tea was made, and the landlady, unwilling, I suppose, to lose any
time, observing my silence and shyness before this entire stranger:
"Come, Miss Fanny," says she, in a coarse familiar style, and tone of
authority, "hold up your head, child, and do not let sorrow spoil that
pretty face of yours. What! sorrows are only for a time; come, be free,
here is a worthy gentleman who has heard of your misfortunes, and is
willing to serve you; you must be better acquainted with him, do not you
now stand upon your punctilios, and this and that, but make your market
while you may."

At this so delicate, and eloquent harangue, the gentleman, who saw I
loooked frighted and amazed, and, indeed, incapable of answering, took
her up for breaking things in so abrupt a manner, as rather to shock
than incline me to an acceptance of the good he intended me then,
addressing himself to me, told me "he was perfectly acquainted with my
whole story, and every circumstance of my distress which he owned was a
cruel plunge for one of my youth and beauty to fall into.... that he had
long taken a liking to my person, for which he appealed to Mrs. Jones,
there present; but finding me so deeply engaged to another, he had lost
all hopes of succeeding, till he had heard the sudden reverse of fortune
that had happened to me, on which he had given particular orders to my
landlady to see that I should want for nothing; and that, had he not
been forced abroad to the Hague, on affairs he could not refuse himself
to, he would himself have attended me during my sickness;... that on
his return, which was the day before, he had, on learning my recovery,
desired my landlady's good offices to introduce him to me, and was
as angry, at least, as I was shocked, at the manner in which she had
conducted herself towards obtaining him that happiness; but, that to
show me how much he disdained her procedure, and how far he was from
taking any ungenerous advantage of my situation, and from exacting
any security for my gratitude, he would before my face, that instant,
discharge my debt entirely to my landlady, and give me her receipt in
full; after which I should be at liberty either to reject or grant his
suit, as he was much above putting any force upon my inclinations."

Whilst he was exposing his sentiments to me, I ventured just to look up
to him, and observed his figure, which was that of a very well-looking
gentleman, well made, of about forty, dressed in a suit of plain
clothes, with a large diamond ring on one of his fingers, the lustre of
which played in my eyes as he waved his hand in talking, and raised my
notions of his importance. In short, he might pass for what is commonly
called a comely black man, with an air of distinction natural to his
birth and condition.

To all his speeches, however, I answered only in tears that flower
plentifully to my relief, and choking up my voice, excused me from
speaking, very luckily, for I should not have known what to say.

The sight, however, moved him, as he afterwards told me, irresistibly,
and by way of giving me some reason to be less powerfully afflicted, he
drew out his purse, and calling for pen and ink, which the landlady was
prepared for, paid her every farthing of her demand, independent of a
liberal gratification which was to follow unknown to me, and taking a
receipt in full, very tenderly forced me to secure it, by guiding my
hand, which he had thrust it into, so as to make me passively put it
into my pocket.

Still I continued in a state of stupidity, or melancholic despair, as
my spirits could not yet recover from the violent shocks that they had
received; and the accommodating landlady had actually left the room, and
me alone with this strange gentleman, before I had observed it, and then
I observed it without alarm, for I was now lifeless, and indifferent to
every thing.

The gentleman, however, no novice in affairs of this sort, drew near me;
and, under the pretence of comforting me, first with his handkerchief
dried my tears as they ran down my cheeks: presently he ventured to kiss
me on my part, neither resistance nor compliance. I sat stock still; and
now looking on myself as bought by the payment that had been transacted
before me.

I did not care what became of my wretched body: and wanting life,
spirits, or courage to oppose the least struggle, even that of the
modesty of my sex, I suffered, tamely, whatever the gentleman pleased;
who proceeding insensibly from freedom to freedom, insinuating his hand
between my handkerchief and bosom, which he handled at discretion:
finding thus no repulse, and that every thing favoured, beyond
expectation, the completion of his desires, he took me in his arms, and
bore me, without life or motion, to the bed, on which laying me gently
downed, and having me at what advantage he pleased, I did not so much
as know what he was about, till recovering from a trance of lifeless
insensibility, I found him buried in me, whilst I lay passive and
innocent of the least sensations of pleasure: a death-cold corpse could
scarce have less life or sense in it. As soon as he had thus pacified
a passion which had too little respected the condition I was in, he got
off, and after recomposing the disorder of my clothes, employed himself
with the utmost tenderness to calm the transports of remorse and madness
at myself, with which I was seized, too late, I confess, for having
suffered on that bed, the embraces of an utter stranger I tore my hair,
wrung my hands, and beat my breast like a mad woman. But when my new
master, for in that light I then viewed him, applied himself to appease
me, as my whole rage was levelled at myself, no part of which I thought
myself permitted to aim at him, I begged of him with more submission
than anger, to leave me alone, that I might, at least, enjoy my
affliction in quiet. This he positively refused, for fear, as he
pretended, I should do myself a mischief. Violent passions seldom last
long, and those of women least of any. A dead still calm succeeded this
storm, which ended in a profuse shower of tears.

Had any one, but a few instants before, told me that I should have ever
known any man but Charles, I would have spit in his face or had I been
offered infinitely a greater sum of money than that I saw paid for me,
I had spurned the proposal in cold blood. But our virtues and our vices
depend too much on our circumstances; unexpectedly beset as I was,
betrayed by a mind weakened by a long severe affliction, and stunned
with the terrors of a goal, my defeat will appear the more excusable,
since I certainly was not present at, or a party in any sense to it.
However, as the first enjoyment is decisive, and he was now over the
bar, I thought I had no longer a right to refuse the caresses of one
that had got that advantage over me, no matter how obtained; conforming
myself then to this maxim, I considered myself as so much in his power,
that I endured his kisses and embraces without affecting struggles or
anger; not that he, as yet, gave me any pleasure, or prevailed over the
aversion of my soul, to give myself up to any sensation of that sort;
what I suffered, I suffered out of a kind of gratitude, and as a matter
of course what had passed.

He was, however, so regardful as not to attempt the renewal of those
extremities which had thrown me, just before, into such violent
agitations; but, now secure of possession, contented himself with
bringing me to temper by degrees, and waiting at the hand of time
for those fruits of generosity and courtship, which he since often
reproached himself with having gathered much too green, when, yielding
to the inability to resist him, and overborne by desires, he had wreaked
his passion on a mere lifeless, spiritless body, dead to all purpose of
joy, since taking none, it ought to be supposed incapable of giving any.
This is, however, certain; my heart never thoroughly forgave him the
manner in which I had fallen to him, although, in point of interest,
I had fallen to him, I had reason to be pleased that he found, in my
person, wherewithal to keep him from leaving me as easily as he had had
me.

The evening was, in the mean time, so far advanced, that the maid came
in to lay the cloth for supper, when I understood, with joy, that my
landlady, whose sight was present poison to me, was not to be with us.

Presently a neat and elegant supper was introduced, and a bottle of
Burgundy, with the other necessaries, were set on a dumb-waiter.

The maid quitting the room, the gentleman insisted, with a tender
warmth, that I should sit up in the elbow chair by the fire, and see him
eat, if I could not be prevailed on to eat myself. I obeyed with a heart
full or affliction, at the comparison it made between those delicious
tete-a-tetes with my very dear youth, and this forced situation, this
new awkward scene, imposed and obtruded on me a cruel necessity.

At supper, after a great many arguments used to comfort and reconcile
me to my fate, he told me that his name was H..., brother to the Earl
of L.... and that having, by the suggestions of my landlady, been led
to see me, he had found me perfectly to his taste, and given her
a commission to procure me at any rate, and that at length he had
succeeded, as much to his satisfaction as he passionately wished it
might be to mine adding, withal, some flattering assurances, that I
should have no cause to repent my knowledge of him.

I had now got down at least half a partridge, and three or four glasses
of wine, which he compelled me to drink by way of restoring nature, but
whether there was any thing extraordinary put into the wine, or whether
there wanted no more to revive the natural warmth of my constitution,
and give fire to the old train, I began no longer to look with that
constraint, not to say disguise, on Mr. H...., which I had hitherto
done but, withal, there was not the least grain of love mixed with this
softening of my sentiments: any other man would have been just the same
to me as Mr. H..., that stood in the same circumstances, and had done
for me, and with me, what he had done.

There are not, on earth at least, eternal griefs; mine were, if not at
an end, at least suspended: my heart, which had been so long overloaded
with anguish and vexation, began to dilate and open to the last gleam
of diversion or amusement. I wept a little, and my tears relieved me; I
sighed, and my sighs seemed to lighten me of a load that oppressed me;
my countenance grew, if not cheerful, at least more composed and free.

Mr. H..., who had watched, perhaps brought on this change, knew too well
not to seize it: he thrust the table imperceptibly from between us, and
bringing his chair to face me, he soon began, after preparing me by all
the endearments of assurance and protestations, to lay hold of my hands,
to kiss me, and once more to make free with my bosom, which, being at
full liberty from the disorder of a loose dishabile, now panted and
throbbed, less with indignation than with fear and bashfulness, at being
used so familiarly by still a stranger. But he soon gave me greater
occasion to exclaim, by stooping down and slipping his hands above my
garters; thence he strove to regain the pass, which he had before found
so open, and unguarded; but now he could not unlock the twist of my
thighs; I gently complained, and begged him to let me alone; told him
I was not well. However, he saw there was more form and ceremony in my
resistance, than good earnest; he made his conditions for desisting from
pursuing his point, that I should be put instantly to bed, whilst he
gave certain orders to the landlady, and that he would return in an
hour, when he hoped to find me more reconciled to his passion for me,
than I seemed at present. I neither assented nor denied, but my air and
manner of receiving his proposal, gave him to see that I did not think
myself enough my own mistress to refuse it.

Accordingly he went out and left me, when a minute or two after, before
I could recover myself into any composure for thinking, the maid came
in with her mistress's service, and a small silver orringer of what she
called a bridal posset, and desired me to eat it as I went to bed,
which consequently I did, and felt immediately a heat, a fire run like a
hue-and-cry through every part of my body; I burnt, I glowed, and wanted
even little of wishing for any man.

The maid, as soon as I was lain down, took the candle away, and wishing
me a good night, went out of the room, and shut the door after her.

She had hardly time to get down stairs, before Mr. H.... opened my room
door softly, and came in, now undressed, in his night-gown and cap,
with two lighted wax candles, and bolting the door, gave me, though I
expected him, some sort of alarm. He came a tip-toe to the bed side, and
saying with a gentle whisper: "Pray, my dear, do not be startled... I
will be very tender and kind to you." He then hurried off his clothes,
and leaped into bed, having given me openings enough, whilst he was
stripping, to observe his brawny structure, strong made limbs, and rough
shaggy breast.

The bed shook again when it received this new load. He lay on
the outside, where he kept the candles burning, no doubt for the
satisfaction of every sense, for as soon as he had kissed me, he rolled
down the bed clothes, and seemed transported with the view of all my
person at full length, which he covered with a profusion of kisses,
sparing no part of me. Then, being on his knees between my thighs, he
drew up his shirt, and bared all his hairy thighs, and stiff staring
truncheon, red top, and rooted into a thicket of curls, which covered
his belly to the novel, and gave it the air of a flesh brush; and soon
I feel it joining close to mine, when he had drove the nail up to the
head, and left no partition but the intermediate hair on both sides.

I had it now, I felt it now, and, beginning to drive, he soon gave
nature such a powerful summons down to her favourite quarters, that she
could no longer refuse repairing thither; all my animals spirits then
rushed mechanically to that center of attraction, and presently, inly
warmed, and stirred as I was beyond bearing, I lost all restraint, and
yielding to the force of the emotion, gave down, as mere woman, those
effusions of pleasure, which, in the strictness of still faithful love,
I could have wished to have kept in.

Yet oh! what an immense difference did I feel between this impression of
a pleasure merely animal, and struck out of the collision of the sexes,
by a passive bodily effect, from that sweet fury, that rage of active
delight which crowns the enjoyments of a mutual love passion, where two
hearts, tenderly and truly united, club to exalt the joy, and give it
a spirit and soul that bids defiance to that end which mere momentary
desires generally terminate in, when they die of a surfeit of
satisfaction!

Mr. H..., whom no distinctions of that sort seemed to distract, scarce
gave himself or me breathing time from the last encounter, but, as if he
had tasked himself to prove that the appearances of his vigour were
no signs hung out in vain, in a few minutes he was in a condition for
renewing the onset; to which, preluding with a storm of kisses, he drove
the same course as before, with unbated fervour; and thus, in repeated
engagements, kept me constantly in exercise, till dawn of morning, in
all which time he made me fully sensible of the virtues of his firm
texture of limbs, his square shoulders, broad chest, compact hard
muscles, in short a system of manliness, that might pass for no bad
image of our ancient sturdy barons, whose race is now so thoroughly
refined and frittered away into the more delicate and modern built frame
of our pap-nerved softlings, who are as pale, as pretty, and almost as
masculine as their sisters.

Mr. H..., content, however, with having the day break upon his triumph,
resigned me up to the refreshment of a rest we both wanted, and we soon
dropped into a profound sleep.

Though he was some time awake before me, yet he did not offer to disturb
a repose he had given me so much occasion for; but on my first stirring,
which was not till past ten o'clock, I was obliged to endure one more
trial of his manhood.

About eleven, in came Mrs. Jones, with two basins of the richest soup,
which her experience in these matters had moved her to prepare. I pass
over the fulsome compliments, the cant of the decent procuress, with
which she saluted us both; but though my blood rose at the sight of her,
I supprest my emotions, and gave all my concerne to reflections on what
would be the consequence of this new engagement.

But Mr. H..., who penetrated my uneasiness, did not suffer me to
languish under it, and acquainted me, that having taken a solid sincere
affection to me, he would begin by giving me one leading mark of it, in
removing me out of a house which must, for many reasons, be irksome and
disagreeable to me, into convenient lodgings, where he would take all
imaginable care of me; and desiring not to have any explanations with
my landlady, or be impatient till he returned, he dressed and went out,
having left me a purse with two and twenty guineas in it, being all
he had about him, as he express it, to keep my pocket still further
supplied.

As soon as he was gone, I felt the usual consequence of the first launch
into vice (for my love attachment to Charles never appeared to me in
that light). I was instantly borne away down the stream without making
back to the shore. My dreadful necessities, my gratitude, and above all,
to say the plain truth, the dissipation and diversion I began to find
in this new acquaintance, from the black corroding thoughts my heart had
been a prey to, ever since the absence of my dear Charles, concurred to
stun all my contrary reflections. If I now thought of my first, my only
charmer, it was still with the tenderness and regret of the fondest
love, embittered with the consciousness that I was no longer worthy
of him. I could have begged my bread with him all over the world, but
wretch that I was! I had neither the virtue or courage requisite not to
outlive my separation from him.

Yet, had not my heart been thus preengaged, Mr. H... might probably have
been the sole master of it; but the place was full, and the force of
conjectures alone had made him the possessor of my person; the charms
of which had, by the bye, been his sole object and passion, and were, of
course, no foundation for a love either very delicate or very durable.

He did not return till six in the evening', to take me away to my
new lodgings; and my moveables being soon packed, and conveyed into
a hackney coach, it cost me but little regret to take my leave of a
landlady whom I thought I had so much reason not to be over pleased
with; and as for her part, she made no other difference to my staying or
going, but what that of the profit created.

We soon got to the house appointed for me, which was that of a plain
tradesman, who, on the score of interest, was entirely at Mr. H...'s
devotion, and who let him the first floor, very genteelly furnished,
for two guineas a week, of which I was instated mistress, with a maid to
attend me.

He stayed with me that evening, and we had a supper from a neighbouring
tavern, after which, and a gay glass or two, the maid put me to bed. Mr.
H.... soon followed, and notwithstanding the fatigues of the preceding
night, I found no quarter nor remission from him: he piquet himself, as
he told me, on doing the honours of my new apartment.

The morning being pretty well advanced, we got to breakfast; and the ice
now broke, my heart, no longer engrossed by love, began to take ease,
and to please itself with such trifles Mr. H....'s liberal liking led
him to make his court to the usual vanity of our sex. Silks, laces:
ear rings, pearl necklace, gold watch, in sort, all the trinkets and
articles of dress were lavishly heaped upon me; the sence of which, if
it did not create returns of love, forced a kind of grateful fondness,
something like love: a distinction which it would be spoiling the
pleasure of nine tenths of the keepers in the town to make, and is, I
suppose, the very good reason why so few of them ever do make it.

I was now established the kept mistress in form, well lodged, with a
very sufficient allowance, and lighted up with all the lustre of dress.

Mr. H.... continued kind and tender to me; yet, with all this, I was
far from happy: for, besides my regrets for my dear youth, which,
though often suspended or diverted, still returned upon me in certain
melancholic moments with redoubled violence, I wanted more society,
more dissipation.

As to Mr. H.... he was so much my superior in every sense, that I felt
it too much to the disadvantage of the gratitude I owed him. Thus he
gained my esteem, though he could not raise my taste; I was qualified
for no sort of conversation with him, except one sort, and that is a
satisfaction which leaves tiresome intervals, if not filled up by love,
or other amusements.

Mr. H...., so experienced, so learned in the ways of women, numbers
of whom had passed through his hands, doubtless, soon perceived this
uneasiness, and, without approving, or liking me the better for it, had
the complaisance to indulge me.

He made suppers at my lodging, where he brought several companions of
his pleasures, with their mistresses; and by this means I got into a
circle of acquaintance, that soon stripped me of all the remains of
bashfulness and modesty which might be yet left of my country education,
and were, to a just taste, perhaps, the greatest of my charms.

We visited one another in form, and mimicked, as near as we could, all
the miseries, the follies, and impertinencies of the women in quality,
in the round of which they trifle away their time, without it ever
entering their little heads, that on earth there cannot subsist any
thing more silly, more flat, more insipid and worthless, than, generally
considered, their system of life is: they ought to treat the men as
their tyrants, indeed! were they to condemn them to it.

But though, amongst the kept mistresses (and I was now acquainted with
a good many, besides some useful matrons, who live by their connexions
with them), I hardly knew one that did not perfectly detest their
keepers, and, of course, made little or no scruple of any infidelity
they could safely accomplish, I had still no notion of wronging mine:
for, besides that no mark of jealousy on his side started me the hint,
or gave me the provocation to play him a trick of that sort, and that
his constant generosity, politeness, and tender attention to please me,
forced a regard to him, that, without affecting my heart, insured him my
fidelity, no object had yet presented that could overcome the habitual
liking I had contracted for him and I was on the eve of obtaining, from
the movements of his own voluntary generosity, a modest provision for
life, when an accident happened which broke all the measures he had
resolved upon in my favour.

I had now lived near seven months with Mr. H.... when one day returning
to my lodgings, from a visit in the neighbourhood, where I used to stay
longer, I found the street door open, and the maid of the house standing
at it, talking with some of her acquaintance, so that I came in without
knocking and, as I passed by, she told me Mr. H.... was above. I slept
up stairs into my own bed-chamber, with no other thought than of pulling
off my hat etc., and then to wait upon him in the dining room, into
which my bed-chamber had a door, as is common enough. Whilst I was
untying my hat strings, I fancied I heard my maid Hannah's voice and a
sort of tustle, which raised my curiosity; I stole softly to the door,
where a knot in the wood had been slipped out, and afforded a very
commanding peep-hole to the scene then in agitation, the actors of which
had been to earnestly employed to hear my opening my own door, from the
landing place of the stairs, into my bedchamber.

The first sight that struck me was Mr. H.... pulling and hauling this
coarse country strammel towards a couch that stood in a corner of the
dining-room; to which the girl made only a sort of awkward holdening
resistance, crying out so loud, that I, who listened at the door, could
scarce hear her: "Pray Sir, don't.., let me alone... I am not for your
turn... You cannot, sure, demean yourself with such a poor body as I...
Lord! Sir, my mistress may come home... I must not indeed... I will
cry out..." All of which did not hinder her from insensibly suffering
herself to be brought to the foot of the couch, upon which a push of no
mighty violence served to give her a very easy fall, and my gentleman
having got up his hands to the strong hold of her Virtue, she, no
doubt, thought it was time to give up the argument, and that all further
defense would be vain: and he, throwing her petticoats over her face,
which was now as red as scarlet, discovered a pair of stout, plump,
substantial thighs, and tolerably white; he mounted them round his haps,
and coming out with his drawn weapon, stuck it in the cloven sport,
where he seemed to find a less difficult entrance than perhaps he had
flattered himself with (for, by the way, this blouse had left her place
in the country, for a bastard), and, indeed, all his motions shewed he
was lodged pretty much at large. After he had done, his Deare gets up,
drops her petticoats down, and smooths her apron and handkerchief. Mr.
H.... looked a little silly, and taking out some money, gave it her,
with an air indifferent enough, bidding her be a good girl, and say
nothing.

Had I loved this man, it was not in nature for me to have had patience
to see the whole scene through: I should have broke in and played the
jealous princess with a vengeance. But that was not the case: my pride
alone was hurt, my heart not, and I could easier win upon myself to see
how far he would go, till I had no uncertainty upon my conscience.

The least delicate of all affairs of this sort being now over, I retired
softly into my closet, where I began to consider what I should do. My
first scheme naturally, was to rush in and upbraid them; this, indeed,
flattered my present emotions and vexations, as it would have given
immediate vent to them; but, on second thoughts, not being so clear
as to the consequence to be apprehended from such a step, I began my
discovery still a safer season, when dissembly my discovery till a safer
season, when Mr. H.... should have perfected the settlement he had
made overtures to me of, and which I was not to think such a violent
explanation, as I was indeed not equal to the management of, could
possibly forward, and might destroy. On the other hand, the provocation
seemed too gross, too flagrant not to give me some thoughts of revenge;
the very start of which idea restored me to perfect composure; and
delighted as I was with the confused plan of it in my head, I was
easily mistress enough of myself to support the part of ignorance I
had prescribed to myself; and as all this circle of reflections was
instantly over, I stole a tip-toe to the passage door, and opening it
with a noise, passed for having that moment come home; and after a short
pause, as if to pull off my things, I opened the door into the dining
room, where I fund the dowdy blowing the fire, and my faithful shepherd
walking about the room, and wistling, as cool and unconcerned as if
nothing had happened. I think, however, he had not much to brag of
having out-dissembled me: for I kept up, nobly, the character of our sex
for art, and went up to him with the same open air of frankness as I had
ever received him. He stayed but a little while, made some excuse for
not being able to stay the evening with me, and went out.

As for the wench, she was now spoiled, at least for my servant; and
scarce eight and forty hours were gone round, before her insolence, on
what had passed betwen Mr. H.... and her, gave me so fair an occasion
to turn her away, at a minute's warning, that, not to have done it would
have been the wonder; so that he could neither disapprove it nor find
in it the least reason to suspect my original motive. What became of her
afterwards, I know not; but generous as Mr. H.... was, he undoubtedly
made her amends: though, I dare answer, that he kept up no further
commerce with her of that sort; as his stooping to such a coarse morsel,
was only a sudden sally of lust, on seeing a wholesome looking, buxom
country wench, and no more strange than hunger, or even a whimsical
appetite's making a fling meal of neck-beef, for change of diet.

Had I considered this escapade of Mr. H.... in no more than that light
and contented myself with turning away the wench, I had thought and
acted right; but, flushed as I was with imaginary wrongs, I should have
held Mr. H... to have been cheaply off, if I had not pushed my revenge
farther, and repaid him, as exactly as could for the soul of me, in the
same coin.

Nor was this worthy act of justice long delayed: I had it too much at
heart. Mr. H... had, about a fortnight before, taken into his service
a tenant's son, just come out the country, a very handsome young lad,
scarce turned of nineteen, fresh as a rose, well sharped and clear
limbed: in short, a very good excuse for any woman's liking, even
though revenge had been out of the question; any woman, I say, who
was disprejudiced, and that wit and spirit enough to prefer a point of
pleasure to a point of pride.

Mr. H... had clapped a livery upon him; and his chief employ was, after
being shewn my lodgings, to bring and carry letters or messages between
his master and me; and as the situation of all kept ladies is not
the fittest to inspire respect, even to the meanest of mankind, and,
perhaps, less of it from the most ignorant, I could not help observing
that this lad, who was, I suppose, acquainted with my relation to his
master by his fellow servants, used to eye me in that bashful confused
way, more expressive, more moving and readier caught at by our sex, than
any other declarations whatever: my figure had, it seems, struck him,
and modest and innocent as he was, he did not himself know that the
pleasure he took in looking at me was love, or desire; but his eyes,
naturally wanton, and now inflamed with passion, spoke a great deal more
than he durst have imagined they did. Hitherto, indeed, I had only taken
notice of the comeliness of the youth, but without the least design: my
pride alone would have guarded me from a thought that way, had not
Mr. H....'s condescension with my maid, where there was not half the
temptation, in point of person, set me a dangerous example; but now I
began to look on this stripling as every way a delicious instrument
of my designed retaliation upon Mr. H.... of an obligation for which I
should have made a conscience to die in his debt.

In order then to pave the way for the accomplishment of my scheme, for
two or three times that the young fellow came to me with messages, I
managed so, or without affectation to have him admitted to my bed side,
or brought to me at my toilet, where I was dressing; and by carelessly
shewing or letting him, as if without meaning or design, sometimes my
bosom rather more bare than it should be; sometimes my hair, of which I
had a very fine head, in the natural flow of it while combing; sometimes
a neat leg, that had unfortunately slipt its garter, which I made no
scruple of tying before him, easily gave him the impressions favourable
to my purpose, which I could perceive to sparkle in his eyes, and glow
in his cheeks: then certain slight squeezes by the hand, as I took
letters from him, did his business completely.

When I saw him thus moved, and fired for my purpose, I inflamed him
yet more, by asking him several leading questions, such as: "Had he a
mistress?... was she prettier than me?... could he love such a one as I
was?..." and the like; to all which the blushing simpleton answered to
my wish, in a strain of perfect nature, perfect undebauched innocence,
but with all the awkwardness and simplicity of country breeding.

When I thought I had sufficiently ripened him for the laudable point I
had in view, one day that I expected him at a particular hour, I took
care to have the coast clear for the reception I designed him; and, as
I laid it, he came to the dining room door, tapped at it, and, in my
bidding him come in; he did so, and shut the door after him. I desired
him, then, to bolt it on the inside, pretending it would not otherwise
keep shut.

I was then lying at length upon that very couch, the scene of Mr.
H....'s polite joys, in an undress, which was with all the art of
negligence flowing loose, and in a most tempting disorder: no stays,
no hoop..., no incumbrance whatever. On the other hand, he stood at a
little distance, that gave me a full view of a fine featured, shapely,
healthy country lad, breathing the sweets of fresh blooming youth;
his hair, which was of a perfect shining black, played to his face in
natural side curls, and was set out with a smart tuck-up behind; new
buckskin breechs, that, clipping close, shewed the shape of a plump,
well made thigh; white stockings, garter-laced livery, shoulder knot,
altogether composed a figure of pure flesh and blood, and appeared
under no disgrace from the lowness of a dress, to which a certain spruce
neatness seems peculiarly fitted.

I bid him come towards me, and give me his letter, at the same time
throwing down, carelessly, a book I had in my hands. He coloured,
and came within reach of delivering me the letter, which he held out,
awkwardly enough, for me to take, with his eyes rivetted on my
bosom, which was, through the designed disorder of my handkerchief,
sufficiently bare, and rather than hid.

I, smiling in his face, took the letter, and immediately catching
hold of his shirt sleeve, drew him towards me, blushing, and almost
trembling; for surely his extreme bashfulness, and utter inexperience
called for, at least, all the advances to encourage him: his body
was now conveniently inclined toward me, and just softly chucking his
beardless chin, I asked him: "If he was afraid of a lady?..." and with
that took, and carrying his hands to my breasts, I press it tenderly
to them. They were now finely furnished, and raised in flesh, so that,
panting with desire, they rose and fell, in quick heaves, under his
touch: at this, the boy's eyes began to lighten with all the fires of
inflamed nature, and his cheeks flushed with a deep scarlet: tongue-tied
with joy, rapture, and bashfulness, he could not speak, but then his
looks, his emotion, sufficiently satisfied me that my train had taken,
and that I had no disappointment to fear.

My lips, which I threw in his way, so that he could not escape kissing
them, fixed, fired, and emboldened him: and now, glancing my eyes
towards that part of his dress which covered the essential object of
enjoyment, I plainly discovered the swell and commotion there; and as
I was now too far advanced to stop in so fair a way, and was indeed no
longer able to contain myself, or wait the slower progress of his maiden
bash-fulness (for such it seemed, and really was), I stole my hands upon
his thighs, down one of which I could both see and feel a stiff hard
body, confined by his breeches, that my fingers could discover no end
to. Curious then, and eager to unfold so alarming a mystery, playing,
as it were, with his buttons, which were bursting ripe from the active
force within, those of his waistband and fore-flap flew open at a touch,
when out IT started; and now, disengaged from the shirt, I saw, with
wonder and surprise, what? not the play thing of a boy, not the weapon
of a man, but a Maypole, of so enormous a standard, that had proportions
been observed, it must have belonged to a young giant. Yet I could not,
without pleasure, behold, and even venture to feel, such a length, such
a breadth of animated ivory! perfectly well turned and fashioned, the
proud stiffness of which distented its skin, whose smooth polish and
velvet softness might vie with that of the most delicate of our sex, and
whose exquisite whiteness was not a little set off by a sprout of black
curling hair round the root: through the jetty springs of which the fair
skin shewed as in a fine evening you may have remarked the clear light
through the branchwork of distant trees over-topping the summit of a
hill: then the broad of blueish-casted incarnate of the head, and
blue serpentines of its veins, altogether composed the most striking
assemblage of figure and colours in nature. In short, it stood an object
of terror and delight.

But what was yet more surprising, the owner of this natural curiosity,
through the want of occasions in the strictness of his home breeding,
and the little time he had been in town not having afforded him one; was
hitherto an absolute stranger, in practice at least, to the use of all
that manhood he was so nobly stocked with; and it now fell to my lot to
stand his first trial of it, if I could resolve to run the risks of its
disproportion to that tender part of me, which such an oversized machine
was very fit to lay in ruins.

But it was now of the latest to deliberate, for, by this time, the young
fellow, over heated with the present objects, and too high metled to be
longer curbed in by that modesty and awe which had hitherto restrained
him, ventured, under the stronger impulse, and instructive promptership
of nature alone, to slip his hands, trembling with eager impetuous
desires, under my petticoats; and seeing, I suppose, nothing extremely
severe in my looks, to stop or dash him, he feels out, and seizes,
gently, the center spot of his ardours. Oh then! the fiery touch of
his lingers determines me, and my fears melting away before the glowing
intolerable heat, my thighs disclose of themselves, and yield all
liberty to his hand: and now, a favourable movement giving my petticoats
a toss, the avenue lay too fair, too open to be missed. He is now upon
me: I had placed myself with a jerk under him, as commodious and open as
possible to his attempts, which were untoward enough, for his machine,
meeting with no inlet, bore and battered stiffly against me in random
pushes, now above, now below, now beside his point; till, burning with
impatience from its irritating touches, I guided gently, with my hand,
this furious fescue to where my young novice was now to be taught
his first lesson of pleasure. Thus he nicked, at length, the warm and
insufficient orifice; but he was made to find no breach impracticable,
and mine, though so often entered, was still far from wide enough to
take him easily in.

By my direction, however, the head of his unwieldy machine was so
critically pointed, that, feeling him fore-right against the tender
opening, a favourable motion from me met his timely thrust, by which
the lips of it, strenuously dilated, gave way to his thus assisted
impetuosity, so that we might both feel that he had gained a lodgment.
Pursuing then his point, he soon, by violent, and, to me, most painful
piercing thrusts, wedges himself at length so far in, as to be now
tolerably secure of his entrance: here he stuck, and I now felt such a
mixture of pleasure and pain, as there is no giving a definition of. I
dreaded alike his splitting me farther up, or his withdrawing; I could
not bear either to keep or part with him. The sense of pain, however,
prevailing, from his prodigious size and stiffness, acting upon me
in those continued rapid thrusts, with which he furiously pursued his
penetration, made me cry out gently: "Oh, my dear, you hurt me!" This
was enough to check the tender respectful boy even in his mid-career;
and he immediately drew out the sweet cause of my complaint, whilst his
eyes eloquently expressed, at once, his grief for hurting me, and
his reluctance at dislodging from quarters, of which the warmth and
closeness had given him a gust of pleasure, that he was now desire mad
to satisfy, and yet too much a novice not to be afraid of my withholding
his relief, on account of the pain he had put me to.

But I was, myself, far from being pleased with his having too much
regarded my tender exclaims; for now, more fired with the object before
me, as it still stood with the fiercest erection, unbonneted,
and displayed its broad vermilion head, I first gave the youth a
re-encouraging kiss, which he repaid me with a fervour that seemed at
once to thank me, and bribe my further compliance; and soon replaced
myself in a posture to receive, at all risk, the renewed invasion, which
he did not delay an instant: for, being presently remounted, I once
more felt the smooth hard gristle forcing an entrance, which he achieved
rather easier than before. Pained, however, as I was, with his efforts
of gaining a complete admission, which he was so regardful as to manage
by gentle degrees, I took care not to complain. In the mean time, the
soft strait passage gradually loosens, yields, and, stretched to its
utmost bearing, by the stick, thick, indriven engine, sensible, at once,
to the ravishing pleasure of the feel and the pain of the distension,
let him in about half way, when all the most nervous activity he now
exerted, to further his penetration, gained him not an inch of his
purpose: for, whilst he hesitated there, the crisis of pleasure overtook
him, and the close compressure of the warm surrounding flow drew from
him the ecstatic gush, even before mine was ready to meet it, kept up
by the pain I had endured in the course of the engagement, from the
insufferable size of his weapon, though it was not as yet in above half
its length.

I expected then, but without wishing it, that he would draw, but was
pleasingly disappointed: for he was not to be let off so. The well
breathed youth, hot-mettled, and flush with genial juices, was now
fairly in for making me know my driver. As soon, then, as he had made a
short pause, waking, as it were, out of the trance of pleasure (in which
every sense seemed lost for a while, whilst, with his eyes shut, and
short quick breathings, he had yielded down his maiden tribute), he
still kept his post, yet unsated with enjoyment, and solacing in these
so new delights; till his stiffness, which had scarce perceptibly
remitted, being thoroughly recovered to him, who had not once
unsheathed, he proceeded afresh to cleave and open to himself an entire
entry into me, which was not a little made easy to him by the balsamic
injection, with: which he had just plentifully moistened the whole
internals of the passage. Redoubling, then, the active energy of his
thrusts, favoured by the fervid appetency of my motions, the soft oiled
wards can no longer stand so effectual a picklock, but yield, and open
him an entrance. And now, with conspiring nature, and my industry,
strong to aid him, he pierces, penetrates, and at length, winning his
way inch by inch, gets entirely in, and finally, a home made thrust
sheaths it up to the guard; on the information of which, from the close
jointure of our bodies (insomuch that the hair on both sides perfectly
interweaved and incircled together), the eyes of the transported
youth sparkled with more joyous fires, and all his looks and motions
acknowledged excess of pleasure, which I now began to share, for I felt
him in my very vitals! I was quite sick with delight! stirred beyond
bearing with its furious agitations within me, and gorged and crammed,
even to a surfeit. Thus I lay gasping, panting under him, till his
broken breathings, faultering accents, eyes twinkling with humid fires,
lunges more furious, and an increased stiffness, gave me to hail
the approaches of the second period: it came... and the sweet youth,
overpowered with the ecstasy, died away in my arms, melting a flood
that shot in genial warmth into the innermost recesses of my body; every
conduit of which, dedicated to that pleasure, was on flow to mix with
it. Thus we continued for some instants, lost, breathless, senseless of
every thing, and in every part but those favourite ones of nature,
in which all that we enjoyed of life and sensation was now totally
concentered.

When our mutual trance was a little over, and the young fellow had
withdrawn that delicious stretcher, with which he had most plentifully
drowned all thoughts of revenge, in the sense of actual pleasure, the
widened wounded passage refunded a stream of pearly liquids, which
flowed down my thighs, mixed with streaks of blood, the marks of the
ravage of that monstrous machine of his, which had now triumphed over
a kind of second maidenhead. I stole, however, my handkerchief to those
parts, and wiped them as dry as I could, whilst he was re-adjusting and
buttoning up.

I made him sit down by me, and as he had gathered courage from such
extreme intimacy, he gave me an aftercourse of pleasure, in a natural
burst of tender gratitude and joy, at the new scenes of bliss I had
opened to him: scenes positively new, as he had never before had the
least acquaintance with that mysterious mark, the cloven stamp of female
distinction, though nobody better qualified than he to penetrate into its
deepest recesses, or do it nobler justice. But when, by certain motions,
certain unquietness of his hands, that wandered not without design, I
found he languished for satisfying a curiosity, natural enough, to view
and handle those parts which attract and concenter the warmest force
of imagination, charmed, as I was, to have any occasion of obliging and
humouring his young desires, I suffered him to proceed as he pleased,
without check or control, to the satisfaction of them.

Easily, then, reading in my eyes the full permission of myself to
all his wishes, he scarce pleased himself more than me; when, having
insinuated his hand under my petticoat and shift, he presently removed
those bars to the sight, by slily lifting them upwards, under favour
of a thousand kisses, which he thought, perhaps, necessary to divert my
attention from what he was about. All my drapery being now rolled up to
my waist, I threw myself into such a posture upon the couch, as gave up
to him, in full view, the whole region of delight, and all the luxurious
landscape around it. The transported youth devoured every thing with
his eyes, and tried, with his fingers, to lay more open to his sight
the secrets of that dark and delicious deep: he opens the folding lips,
the softness of which, yielding entry to any thing of a hard body, close
round it, and oppose the sight; and feeling further, meets with, and
wonder at, a soft fleshy excrescence, which, limber and relaxed after
the late enjoyment, now grew, under the touch and examination of
his fiery fingers, more and more stiff and considerable, till the
titillating ardours of that so sensible part made me sigh, as if he had
hurt me; on which he withdrew his curious probing fingers, asking me
pardon, as it were, in a kiss that rather increased the flame there.

Novelty ever makes the strongest impressions, and in pleasures,
especially; no wonder then, that he was swallowed up in raptures of
admiration of things so interesting by their nature, and now seen and
handled for the first time. On my part, I was richly overpaid for the
pleasure I gave him, in that of examining the power of those objects
thus abandoned to him, naked and free to his loosest wish, over the
artless, natural stripling: his eyes streaming fire, his cheeks
glowing with a florid red, his fervid frequent sighs, whilst his hands
convulsively squeezed, opened, pressed together again the lips and
sides of that deep flesh wound, or gently twitched the over-growing
moss; and all proclaimed the excess, the riot of joys, in having his
wantonness thus humoured. But he did not long abuse my patience, for the
objects before him had now put him by all his, and, coming out with
that formidable machine of his, he lets the fury loose, and pointing it
directly to the pouting-lip mouth, that bid him sweet defiance in dumb
shew, squeezes in his head, and, driving with refreshed rage, breaks in,
and plugs up the whole passage of that soft pleasure-conduit pipe, where
he makes all shake again, and put, once more, all within me into such
an uproar, as nothing could still, but a fresh inundation from the
very engine of those flames, as well as from all the springs with which
nature floats that reservoir of joy, when risen to its floodmark.

I was now so bruised, so battered, so spent with this overmatch, that
I could hardly stir, or raise myself, but lay palpitating, till the
ferment of my senses subsiding by degrees, and the hour striking at
which I was obliged to dispatch my young man, I tenderly advised him of
the necessity there was for parting; at which I felt so much displeasure
as he could do, who seemed eagerly disposed to keep the field, and to
enter on a fresh action. But the danger was too great, and after some
hearty kisses of leave, and recommendations of secrecy and discretion,
I forced myself to send him away, not without assurances of seeing him
again, to the same purpose, as soon as possible, and thrust a guinea
into his hands: not more, less, being too flush of money, a suspicion
or discovery might arise from thence; having everything to fear from the
dangerous indiscretion of that age in which young fellows would be too
irresistible, too charming, if we had not that terrible fault to guard
against.

Giddy and intoxicated as I was with such satiating draughts of pleasure,
I still lay on the couch, supinely stretched out, in a delicious languor
diffused over all my limbs, hugging myself for being thus revenged to
my heart's content, and that in a manner so precisely alike, and on
the identical spot in which I had received the supposed injury. No
reflections on the consequences ever once perplexed me, nor did I make
myself one single reproach for having, by this step, completely entered
myself into a profession more decried than disused. I should have held
it ingratitude to the pleasure I had received, to have repented of it;
and since I was now over the bar, I thought, by plunging head and ears
into the stream I was hurried away by, to drown all sense of shame or
reflection.

Whilst I was thus making these laudable dispositions, and whispering
to myself a kind of tacit vow of incontinency, enters Mr. H... The
consciousness of what I had been doing deepened yet the glowing of my
cheeks, flushed with the warmth of the late action, which, joined to
the piquant air of my dishabile, drew from Mr. H.... a compliment on my
looks, which he was proceeding to bask the sincerity of with proofs, and
that with so brisk an action, as made me tremble for fear of a discovery
from the condition those parts were left in from their late severe
handling: the orifice dilated and inflamed, the lips swollen with their
uncommon distension, the ringlets pressed down, crushed and uncurled
with the over flowing moisture that had wet everything round it; in
short, the different feel and state of things would hardly have passed
upon one of Mr. H.....'s nicety and experience unaccounted for but by
the real cause. But here the woman saved me: I pretended a violent
disorder of my head, and a feverish heat, that indisposed me too much to
receive his embraces. He gave in to this, and good naturedly desisted.
Soon after, an old lady coming in made a third, very apropos for the
confusion I was in, and Mr. H...., after bidding me take care of myself,
and recommending me to my repose, left me much at ease and relieved by
his absence.
